Summary
"* NEW TO MARKET* Offering ornate period features in its sash and case windows and intricate original cornicing, this four-bedroomed first floor property forms part of a handsome Scots-Baronial sandstone crescent in a sought-after address on a quiet residential street in the heart of th..."
"Innerwick is one of Edinburgh’s finest houses, nestled in private, beautifully screened and walled grounds in the much sought after Murrayfield district of Edinburgh. A high amenity area, the property is well located for access to a wide range of excellent private schools, the financial di..."
"Considered Edinburgh’s finest private home this highly prized Georgian mansion is a once-in-a-generation opportunity and arguably the very best family home in Edinburgh. The house is located in the affluent and prestigious Murrayfield area, especially sought after for its close p..."
"Fine Georgian house nestled in particularly private grounds, and including the delightful Old Coach House"
"This outstanding, detached, B-listed Victorian house occupies a generous plot on a sought-after street in the exclusive Grange area of the city; it boasts exceptionally spacious and flexible accommodation including five/six bedrooms, four/five reception areas, and two bathrooms (plus a WC), as we..."
"Splendid and historic refurbished Scots Baronial house finished to an exceptionally high specification, set in grounds of just under one acre within the exclusive Craighouse development"
"A beautiful and unique energy efficient, 21st century home in the heart of the Grange that caters perfectly for modern living."
"Incredibly charming detached Victorian family home in one of Edinburgh's most sought after areas, with accommodation on four floors including a self-contained flat"
"This is a unique opportunity to purchase a stunning detached stone-built period house in the very exclusive district of Wester Coates, in Murrayfield Edinburgh.
 "
24 Northumberland Street is an exceptional 7 bedroom townhouse with south-facing private garden in Edinburgh's New Town.
"A magnificent five bedroom West End home with incredible proportions. This beautiful upper townhouse has five large bedroom suites across four elegant floors. The house is rich in original features, including intricate cornicing, working shutters and open fireplaces. Located in a handsome Victor..."
"AMA Homes brings to the market this magnificent Victorian five bedroom semi-detached house in the sought after Murrayfield Area. Tor House is a magnificent Victorian villa, modelled in a Neo-Jacobean style, which lies in the prestigious Edinburgh suburb of Murrayfield. AMA Homes has sympathetica..."
"Built in 1916, the last of a row of four houses designed by John Jerden and generally considered to be his best. This is one of Colinton’s finest houses.
 "
"11 Carlton Terrace offers the rare opportunity to acquire a meticulously presented, fully restored and refurbished three-storey townhouse in one of Edinburgh’s most coveted addresses. This impeccable family home is second to none and is the epitome of modern Edinburgh living. It..."
"Particularly fine four storey Victorian townhouse with magnificent period detail, self-contained flat, west facing garden and large garage for two cars"
"An outstanding A listed full townhouse on one of the West End’s finest streets. Walker House is a magnificent Georgian townhouse arranged over four floors, situated in the heart of the West End. The house has been restored to reinstate the intricate features of the period including ornate cornic..."
"A unique opportunity to acquire 2 established serviced apartments in Central Edinburgh: The Apartment: Situated over 3rd and 4th floors with 5 bedrooms, lounge, kitchen and bathrooms.and The Loft: Access from 3rd floor level, set over two floors with 5 bedrooms, lounge, kitchen and bathrooms."
An exceptional and prominent townhouse with generous car parking in the heart of Edinburgh city centre
A most impressive B-listed Scots Baronial style house sitting within extensive gardens and grounds.
"A generous, stylish and immaculately presented family home tucked away in an exclusive residential enclave with large private garden in a highly sought after area, close to the city centre."
Spectacular detached modern family home with wonderfully light and spacious accommodation and fine views over The Royal Burgess Golf Course
"Boasting a magnificent indoor mosaic-tiled swimming pool, this design-led five-bedroomed property enjoys a picturesque rural setting situated between the Cammo Estate Nature Reserve and the river Almond Walkway. Spanning over 5,300 square feet, this spectacular and stylishly presented..."
"A beautiful detached house in a private setting with exceptional views. This is a rare opportunity to acquire an outstanding family house in a prime Colinton address, sitting in around 1.3 acres. The house has extensive gardens and private parking as well as beautiful reception rooms and up to e..."
"Spectacular upper villa with garaging, studio and superb gardens, and a delightful southerly outlook to the Royal Botanic Garden"
"A truly spectacular 5 bedroom family home spanning over 3500 sq ft with private garden and parking in Trinity Dunforth Gardens offers a wonderful collection of four unique, luxury family homes. The development consists of two contemporary new homes as well as two newly renovated homes within Dun..."
*VIRTUAL TOUR* Modern semi-detached two-bedroom bungalow with private gardens and garage. Ideal for first / second time movers and for those looking to downsize into something with plenty of storage and private gardens.
"A rare opportunity to purchase a three-bedroom executive triplex penthouse with two large private terraces and secure underground parking, situated in a modern factored building in the highly desirable Quartermile district, just 0.7 mile from Edinburgh’s city centre and Princes Street."
A truly magnificent detached family home characterized by bold geometry and decadent detail typical of a luxury Art Deco home built in the 1930s.
"Five bedroom Victorian townhouse with immaculate interiors and impressive reception space, benefitting from a private garden and stunning skyline views"
Recently renovated and immaculately presented three storey main door townhouse in a prime West End location.
"A beautiful A listed upper townhouse in the heart of the West End. Recently renovated and restored, this three-storey property with its Georgian proportions, including decorative cornicing, cupola and sweeping wrought iron staircase offers contemporary living in classical grandeur. Wi..."
"A beautifully refurbished A-Listed property set over three floors with private garden in Edinburgh’s New Town Gayfield Square is a main door A-listed Georgian property originally designed in 1807 by Hugh Cairncross, a renowned architect and former assistant to Robert Adam. The flat has been lo..."
Impressive detached family home in substantial grounds of just under 1 acre with an all-weather tennis court and potential for a separate plot.
"Delightful semi-detached family home with west facing garden, garage and driveway"
"** NEW TO THE MARKET ** Truly exceptional design-led four-bedroom property that forms part of a handsome sandstone Victorian villa situated in the highly desirable city suburb of Murrayfield. Spanning two floors of the west wing of the original house, the stylishly presented prop..."
"Rare opportunity to acquire a B-listed, detached Georgian house in Trinity with wonderful front and rear gardens, private parking and garage."
"A rare opportunity to purchase a modern detached family villa, with off street parking and sweeping views of the Pentland Hills. "
Luxurious three bed apartment at New Eidyn. Apt 17 is a beautifully crafted three bed apartment finished to the highest standard with an impressive specification. This stunning apartment offers a beautiful openplan space above the hustle and bustle of Edinburgh’s streets. Residen...
"Discover The Townhouse Collection at Craighouse. An exquisite selection of modern townhouses, placed in one of Edinburgh’s most prestigious locations. Here you’ll find the perfect blend of old and new, contemporary homes set within stunning historic grounds. Each townhou..."
"Located in affluent Merchiston and brimming with period character, this grand duplex garden apartment, featuring four bedrooms, four shower rooms, and multiple reception areas, lies within a B-listed Victorian villa offering private gardens and parking (with a detached double garage), and a quiet..."
"An incredibly well presented and captivating 6 bedroom end of terrace Victorian family home with a private driveway and secluded wrap around garden, situated in the desirable Newington district of Edinburgh."
"A wonderful detached home located in the heart of the Grange. This beautifully presented, detached property is set behind wrought iron gates, offering sunny garden areas, garaging and parking for several cars. Findhorn Place is extremely well located on a quiet road in the Grange; one of Edinbur..."
"Impressive and meticulously presented, semi-detached home with private driveway, garages and south facing garden. Situated in a highly desirable area in Newington."
"Impressive townhouse with 2708 sq. ft. of flexible living over 4 floors, Plot 45 boasts a garage, excellent storage throughout and a studio designed kitchen - city living at its best. "
"Wonderful family home with garden and private parking. This handsome, terraced house offers wonderful proportions and original period features, presenting an excellent opportunity to create a charming family home. Upon entering through the front door there is an immediate sense of space. The sit..."
"CLOSING DATE THURSDAY 30TH MARCH 2PM A rarely available opportunity to acquire a three storey family house with garden and off street parking, set in an award winning development"
"A style and spacious three bedroom apartment positioned on the first floor which boasts views of the West End, iconic chapel and superb landscaped gardens."
"Luxurious three bedroom apartment at New Eidyn. Apt 30 is a beautifully crafted three bedroom apartment finished to the highest standard with an impressive specification. This stunning apartment provides a beautiful, unique and sumptuous living space above the hustle and bustle of Edinburgh&rsqu..."
"A selection of four bedroom luxury homes, available to reserve off plan. "
"Set in the heart of Edinburgh's prestigeous New Town, 8c/1 Abercromby Place is a delightful lower ground apartment, forming part of an attractive Georgian building and ..."
"Sought-after three bedroom penthouse coming soon at The Moorings. The Moorings development is part of one of Edinburgh's most exciting regeneration projects. It offers a luxury front-line development of 98 spacious 1, 2, 3 & 4 bedroom apartments, garden apartments with private patio areas, duple..."
Three bedroom ground floor appartment in the sought after Murrayfield within the new AMA Homes development. Torwood House will be finished to the highest of standards and each property benefits from all the luxuries one would expect with modern living. The kitchens have integrated appliances and...
"Rarely available and sought-after end of terrace period home with 5 bedrooms, private garden and double driveway, situated in the highly regarded Grange area."
"• Main door entry • Elegant Georgian features • 2 under pavement cellars • 2500 square feet of space A wonderful opportunity to acquire an impressive Grade A-listed four-bedroom Georgian ground, and garden apartment in a highly sought-after New Town l..."
Lot 1 - Impressive detached family home in substantial grounds with an all-weather tennis court. Plot available separately.
Three bedroom ground floor appartment in the sought after Murrayfield area within the new AMA Homes development. Torwood House will be finished to the highest of standards and each property benefits from all the luxuries one would expect with modern living. The kitchens have integrated appliance...
A beautifully presented seven bedroom detached family home with landscaped gardens in a prestigious Cramond location of Edinburgh
"In the shadow of the city’s iconic Arthur’s Seat, the substantial semi-detached six-bedroomed family house sits on a peaceful one-way residential street in the sought-after neighbourhood of Newington. Just a short walk from Edinburgh’s historic Old Town, the handsome Victorian m..."
"Commanding a beautiful south facing position, 6, Kinnear Road offers the rare opportunity to acquire a spacious ground floor apartment with four bedrooms and private landscaped rose garden, situated peacefully in one of Edinburgh’s most coveted addresses. Owned by the same family for almost..."
"Wonderfully located four bedroom ground and garden flat with private garden in the heart of Edinburgh’s West End This is a well proportioned four bedroom flat with private garden, occupying ground and garden levels. The property can be entered at the ground floor via a smart communal entrance or..."
"A high-spec three-bedroom mews house in a coveted New Town location, part of a stunning development on one of the city’s most sought-after streets. With a strong track record and trusted reputation for professionalism, Square & Crescent is a residential developer with a prim..."
"5A Northumberland Place Lane is a high-spec three-bedroom mews house situated in a coveted New Town location, part of a stunning development on one of the city’s most sought-after streets. With a strong track record and trusted reputation for professionalism, Square & Cresce..."
"Beautifully presented, end of terrace Victorian family home, with single garage and private garden in the sought after residential area of Greenbank"
"8 Osborne Terrace is an impressive traditional detached villa with large driveway and substantial garden grounds situated in Edinburgh's sought-after West End, close to the City Centre."
AVAILABLE TO VIEW NOW This superb property combines the rich heritage of St James Church with beautiful modern interiors and contemporary specification. This is an expansive property over 4 levels combining exquisite features and flexible living. Private garden and parking. Must be vie...
"St. James townhouses is a collection of four and five bedroom homes, combining the rich heritage of St James Church with beautiful modern interiors and contemporary specification. Townhouse 1 is an expansive property over 4 levels combining exquisite features and contemporary living."
"Quietly situated in the highly desirable Trinity Conservation Area is this five-bedroom terrace house with private front and rear gardens. Spanning three spacious and bright floors, this well-proportioned property is in immaculate condition. Close to scenic open spaces, Newhaven Harbour and the f..."
"Idyllic family home with room to grow featuring impressive bright and spacious rooms, generous storage and a high specification.  "
"With its elevated position, just a short walk from Corstorphine Hill Nature Reserve, this semi-detached sandstone house is presented to the market as a wonderful family home. Arranged over two levels, the handsome property offers spacious accommodation including two well-appointed reception rooms..."
"A stunning, double fronted, three bedroom Victorian apartment in the ever popular West End with lift access and off street parking. "
Plot 185 The Logie - final home of this style remaining. Secure this characterful family home with room to grow for 'Just The One' fee of £250*.
"Exceptionally bright and spacious flat with outstanding views, set on the upper two floors of a substantial Victorian townhouse."
"Luxurious 3 bedroom mews home. Set in the heart of Edinburgh’s historic Old Town, a neighbourhood peppered with history and culture, Waverley Square is surrounded by a beguiling mix of contemporary architecture and the Old Town’s medieval characteristics – cobbled str..."
"A beautiful detached three bedroom house, with private garden and parking in Trinity This new detached three bedroom family home has been finished to a high specification with private garden and parking, part of the Dunforth Gardens development. Dunforth Gardens offers a wonderful collection o..."
"A rare opportunity to acquire a five-bedroom property that forms two storeys of an elegant A-listed Georgian terrace situated on a highly desirable street in the heart of Edinburgh’s historic New Town. In need of modernisation and refurbishment, this generously sized property be..."
"Discover flexible living across four levels, Plot 39 features spacious bedrooms, a private balcony, a garage and low maintenance city garden."
"Welcome to 26 Grange RoadMain-door upper villa in the exclusive Grange area of the city, within the Grange conservation area, forming part of a handsome Victorian building with two reception rooms, a breakfasting kitchen, four bedrooms, a shower room, a bathroom, and a WC, plus a private garden, ..."
"Flat 81, 26 Viewforth is an exceptional and contemporary 3-bedroom duplex penthouse in the recently refurbished Boroughmuir Development in popular Bruntsfield just South of the city centre, completed by CALA Homes in 2021 to an exacting standard. Built by John Alexander Carfrae in 1913, this dist..."
"A restored semi-detached 3 bedroom home with private garden and parking in Trinity A fully restored, luxury semi-detached three bedroom home spread over three storeys with private garden and parking. Dunforth Gardens offers a wonderful collection of four unique, luxury family homes. The devel..."
"A superb, light filled and spacious ground and garden apartment in the heart of Edinburgh’s West End. Occupying the ground floor and basement of an original Victorian building the property is located on Palmerston Place, a popular residential street in Edinburgh's West End close to many amenitie..."
"A spacious four-bedroomed first floor apartment in the exclusive area of Inverleith just north of the city centre. This is an opportunity to modernise and renovate part of a Victorian detached property with great proportions, period features, high ceilings and light rooms overlooking the Edinburg..."
An impressive four bedroom family home situated directly on the beautiful Portobello Beach & Promenade with far reaching sea views.
A fabulous two bedroom roof top apartment with a spacious private terrace and two secure underground parking spaces.
A wonderful family home located in the desirable area of Ravelston. This delightful property is a beautiful example of a Victorian terrace. The house enjoys traditional period features and an elevated position. The property is entered via the vestibule and into a generous hallway. Located to ...
"This rarely available, bright and spacious, duplex apartment occupies the lower ground floor and basement level of a classical palace block that is A-listed and dated to the Georgian era (1814-23). Designed by famous architects, Robert Reid and William Sibbald, this exceptional property is also p..."
"King’s Cramond offers the rare opportunity to acquire a detached five-bedroom house, situated in one of Edinburgh’s most coveted areas. This much loved family home built by CALA is presented to the market in immaculate condition with a beautifully landscaped private rear garden and ch..."
Two bedroom ground floor appartment in the sought after Murrayfield within the new AMA Homes development. Torwood House will be finished to the highest of standards and each property benefits from all the luxuries one would expect with modern living. The kitchens have integrated appliances and w...
"A three-bedroom apartment in prestigious Inverleith. Occupying an enviable position next to the Royal Botanic Garden, the property is in turn-key condition. It boasts a sumptuous interior design with high-quality fixtures and fittings set against a lightfilled layout. An enclosed private courtyar..."
"Luxurious two bedroom mews home. Set in the heart of Edinburgh’s historic Old Town, a neighbourhood peppered with history and culture, Waverley Square is surrounded by a beguiling mix of contemporary architecture and the Old Town’s medieval characteristics – cobbled s..."
This 2 bedroom mews house features a spacious open plan kitchen/ living area with bathroom on the first floor and two bedrooms on the second floor.
"Open viewing Sunday 1-3pm An exciting opportunity has arisen to purchase this beautifully presented and rarely available mid-terraced Victorian villa situated in the ever-desirable district of Morningside in the South of Edinburgh. This prime location offers excellent local shops, restaurants,..."
Stunningly decorated five bedroom duplex apartment. Early viewing recommended!
"** NEW TO THE MARKET ** Commanding stunning panoramic views of Edinburgh Castle, Salisbury Crags, and Arthur’s Seat, this is a unique opportunity to acquire a six-bedroom family home situated on a peaceful residential road in the popular city neighbourhood of Blackford. Arra..."
"Closing date: Tuesday 24th January 2023 at 12 noonForming part of a beautiful row of B-listed properties on Torphichen Street, this Georgian townhouse is a unique and stunning development opportunity with approved residential plans (planning ref: 21/06545/FUL) that include a spectacular roof terr..."
"A rare opportunity to purchase this unique, beautifully extended family home offering impressive accommodation enjoying an abundance of natural light and panoramic views, set ..."
"A spacious contemporary, duplex apartment forming part of an exclusive development lying immediately to the south of Edinburgh’s city centre. Located within the Quartermile development the property has a spacious modern feel, benefits from three generous double bedrooms, a parking space in ..."
Beautifully proportioned and well presented ground and first floor apartment with private garden.
"Elegant and immaculate three-bedroom Georgian apartment on one of the finest residential streets in the heart of the New Town, close to all amenities and the bustling atmosphere of Stockbridge whilst only a short walk away to the city centre and cultural highlights. In turn-key condit..."
"WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS – IT’S ENTIRELY YOUR CHOICE. WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £14,999 PLUS WE’LL INCLUDE FLOORING OR WARDROBES. OR, IF YOU'VE GOT A HOME TO SELL WE COULD BE YOUR GUARANTEED BUYER WITH PART EXCHANGE.
This first floor apartment offers a..."
"This property is an impressive four bedroom duplex apartment with private parking. Featuring large master suite with dressing room, and en-suite, and flexible living space with dining kitchen, expansive living room with French doors leading to a balcony, and separate dining room."
"WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS – IT’S ENTIRELY YOUR CHOICE. WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £39,049, PLUS WE’LL INCLUDE FLOORING OR WARDROBES. NEED HELP SELLING YOUR HOME? ASK ABOUT PART EXCHANGE. This impressive family home is designed for modern living with a s..."
"This rarely available, Victorian mid-terraced villa is located in the popular district of Pilrig, in the East of Edinburgh. The location offers an array of local shops, restaurants and amenities, with Leith and the City Centre a short walk away. There are good public transport links as well as ro..."
"Offering wonderfully spacious and flexible accommodation over three floors, sure to appeal to any growing family, this traditional five-bedroom, three-bathroom terraced house, ..."
"Part Exchange AND flooring, OR 50% LBTT Contribution (which could equate to a saving of up to £25,075) available. Boasting a carport and city garden, discover city living on another level with Plot 34. 
 "
A beautifully position detached 5 bedroom family home located in the desirable area of Colinton.
"A selection of three bedroom luxury homes, available to reserve off plan."
"A selection of waterfront three-bedroom apartments at The Moorings. The development at The Moorings is part of one of Edinburgh's most exciting regeneration projects. It offers a luxury front-line development of 98 spacious 1, 2, 3 & 4 bedroom apartments, garden apartments with private patio are..."
"A spacious five bedroom family home occupying a fine corner plot. The house is located in the popular Blackhall area to the west of the city centre and sits within expansive garden ground including off-street parking and a garage. Internally, the accommodation extends to approximately 2164 square..."
"With its striking pitched slate roof, the well-presented modern townhouse is located within the contemporary residential development from AMA Homes designed by renowned British architect Richard Murphy and is situated in the highly sought-after neighbourhood of Cramond. The substantia..."
"A 4-bedroom detached home, offering great potential in the sought-after Blackhall. This property offers an excellent opportunity for those seeking a large family home in a desirable location. A bright, airy hallway welcomes you & provides access to all rooms on the ground floor. A formal sitt..."
"*Final apartment available. Book a private viewing appointment of this beautiful show apartment.* This garden level, two-bedroom apartment is tucked away behind a magnificent Georgian facade, situated on the gentle curve of one of Edinburgh's most sought-after streets. The internal ha..."
"A sleek first floor apartment with well-designed open-plan kitchen and living area, generous bedrooms with ample built-in storage space and en-suite bathroom in the principal bedroom."
"48 Polwarth Terrace is a collection of eight stunning new build and conversion apartments boasting an appealing canalside setting in a quiet residential area of Edinburgh. A unique offering within the development, The Cottage is a sizable three bedroom apartment within the converted ar..."
"This expansive 5 bedroom Victorian terraced villa provides buyers with a wide range of options and uses, with the choice to continue the property as a successful guest house or to transform it into a large family home for luxury lifestyles. The exceptional villa, flanked by landscaped gardens, fe..."
"Currently offering £25k LBTT contribution & a parking space** Luxurious 3 bedroom first floor apartment at Waverley Square. Contact us to book your private Rettie & Co. viewing appointment, or attend the open viewings on Thursdays from 3-7pm and Sundays from 12..."
"FULL MARKET VALUE PART EXCHANGE AVAILABLE. OR, WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS – IT’S ENTIRELY YOUR CHOICE. WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £37,499, PLUS WE’LL INCLUDE FLOORING OR WARDROBES.
This impressive detached family home has a generous open-plan kitchen/dini..."
"Cumberland Street North East Lane offers the rare opportunity to acquire a magnificent three-bedroom new build mews house, tucked away in a peaceful residential street in the heart of Edinburgh’s New Town – a UNESCO World Heritage Site. This fabulous property is second to ..."
"Situated on a peaceful leafy street, 8 Carfrae Park is an immaculate and spaciously extended 5/6 bedroom detached bungalow located in the much sought-after residential suburb of Blackhall just North of the city centre. Set over 2 floors, the property is well equipped for modern family living and ..."
"Luxurious two bed apartment at New Eidyn, St James Quarter. Apt 20 is a beautifully crafted apartment finished to the highest standard with an impressive specification. This stunning apartment offers a beautiful open plan space above the hustle and bustle of Edinburgh’s streets. ..."
Fantastic opportunity to purchase a three bedroom lower villa in a Victorian sandstone villa with its own main door access in the extremely popular Trinity area of Edinburgh. The house is approached via private front garden and driveway which leads to the front door with original mosaic ti...
"NEW FIXED PRICE £10K BELOW HOME REPORT Immaculate, four/five bedroomed split level, detached house in elevated position in sought after leafy Blackhall, situated to the west of Edinburgh city centre. Built in the early 2000s, this attractive white and red brick contemporary prope..."
"FIXED PRICE - £730,000.00 Parliament Square, on the south side of Edinburgh’s High Street behind St. Giles Cathedral, is one of Edinburgh’s significant addresses. This extremely elegant Victorian top floor apartment constitutes part of an “A” listed buildi..."
Explore Plot 188 - a stylish detached family home with a large rear garden and an open plan kitchen/family/dining area. 
"The Farmhouse is a charming 4 bedroom family home in the popular Newhailes Court Gardens development. The Farmhouse is a charming 4 bedroom family home in the popular Newhailes Court Gardens development. This excellent property's space and layout have been based on the original farmhouse, buil..."
"2a Belgrave Crescent is a stunning 2 bedroom, lower ground floor apartment with superb open plan kitchen on the most beautiful crescent in Edinburgh."
"Generously sized penthouse, with two private parking spaces and lift access."
"A contemporary, bright and stylish duplex apartment in one of Edinburgh’s most sought after conservation areas with Hallway, Kitchen/Dining Room, Sitting Room, 4/5 Bedrooms, 2 en-suite Shower rooms, en-suite Bathroom, Downstairs WC, Utility room, Balcony, Under ground parking"
Spacious and modern 4 bedroom townhouse apartment available in the award winning development by AMA at Springwell 3 Ardmillan Mews offers modern and luxurious living with four double bedrooms spread out over three floors. This townhouse lies within AMA’s award winning Springwell development at ...
The Wallace offers plenty of flexible living space and 5 bedrooms for comfortable family living.
"**FIXED PRICE at Home Report Value** A wonderful 4 bedroom family home with open plan kitchen/dining as well as a spacious, separate living room. **FIXED PRICE at Home Report Value** The Maltings offers fabulous family living on the ground floor with both kitchen/dining room and living room g..."
"The THETFORD - This FIVE BEDROOM home has a TRADITIONAL BAY WINDOW which gives the lounge an elegant appeal, complementing a superb L-SHAPED DINING AND FAMILY ROOM that opens on to the garden, and extends into the KITCHEN WITH SEPARATE LAUNDRY ROOM. Two of the five bedrooms are en-suite, and one..."
A well-presented extended detached bungalow situated within the prestigious Swanston district of the city perfectly positioned for access into the City Centre and an ideal ...
"This is a generously proportioned B-listed main door property situated in a popular area of Edinburgh’s New Town. Positioned in a prime residential street of elegant Georgian grandeur with four double bedrooms, spacious living areas, and fine period details it has the potential to be an ideal fam..."
"Neilsons are delighted to offer on to the market this spacious and unique detached villa which forms part of an established and rarely available cul-de-sac, located in the ..."
Rarely available four bedroom detached home with sunny private garden and single garage in Inverleith.
"4/10 Brighouse Park Crescent is a luxurious, well-presented and incredibly spacious four-bedroom penthouse apartment benefitting from east and west facing roof terraces set in an exclusive and modern development in the sought-after area of Cramond. The property offers lift access to all floors an..."
"53/3 North Castle Street is a beautifully presented, light and spacious four-bedroom, three-bathroom duplex apartment arranged over the top three levels of an original Georgian building on an important street in the New Town, with immediate proximity to Edinburgh’s city centre. The property..."
"Constructed circa 1890, this substantial four-bedroom sandstone end terrace villa offers flexible living over two floors and retains many original features."
"This charming second floor flat forms part of a handsome Georgian building built around 1806 within the prestigious New Town district of the city, a UNESCO World heritage site. ..."
"Characterised by Victorian charm, blended seamlessly with contemporary design, this five/six bedroom stone-built semi-detached villa offers a spectacular family home, complete with private gardens and off-street parking. Lovingly upgraded, the property is brimming with period features, including ..."
This is a most impressive four/five-bedroom stone-built terrace property in a coveted location with enviable views over Joppa beach and the waterfront. This home boasts spacious and light filled accommodation spanning two floors with period features and detailed contemporary upgrades for the best...
A superb detached villa situated within the sought after Colinton district of the city perfectly positioned for access to a wide range of local amenities and a short journey to ...
"A recently renovated lower ground floor apartment in Edinburgh’s fashionable West End. This three bedroomed apartment with its own private garden as well as showstopper living room extension comes on the market separately or potentially with No 3 Chester Street, above, also on the market. <..."
"*Now fixed price below home report value* Warners are delighted to present to market this exceptional extended four bedroom detached family home boasting a sun terrace, double ..."
Luxurious PENTHOUSE APARTMENT with CITY VIEWS and EXPANSIVE ROOF TERRACE. DESIGNER KITCHEN & BATHROOMS. Spacious OPEN PLAN LIVING. UNDERGROUND PARKING. 
"** OPEN VIEW SUNDAY 19TH FEBRUARY BETWEEN 3 - 4PM - BY APPOINTMENT ONLY     **Viewing is highly recommend for this four bedroom townhouse finished to an excellent standard.Rare opportunity to acquire one of these unique, ne..."
"New homes at The Engine Yard READY NOW! . Two-bedroom, MODERN apartment in an excellent CITY LOCATION. OPEN PLAN kitchen/living area with PRIVATE BALCONY. Double bedrooms with FITTED WARDOBES."
"*Fixed Price - £15,000 below the Home Report value.*Blair Cadell are delighted to bring to market this beautifully presented Victorian lower villa that retains many fine ..."
"Impressive main-door garden flat forming part of a handsome, C-listed Victorian building in the city's exclusive West End, within the New Town conservation area, boasting beautifully presented interiors, three bedrooms, a generous reception room, a dining kitchen, two shower rooms, and a home off..."
"37 2F1 George Street is a large 3 bedroom, rarely available apartment finished to the highest standard on Edinburgh's most prestigious retail street."
"PLOT 47 'WEST LODGE' IS A LOVELY THREE BEDROOM LODGE COMPLETE WITH A PRIVATE GARDEN AND PRIVATE PARKING. SPRINGWELL WILL BE AMA’S NEWEST EDINBURGH RESIDENTIAL DEVELOPMENT.
"
"A practical family home designed for modern living where light and space rule. An OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN with adjacent UTILITY ROOM and WC has bright DINING AND FAMILY AREAS leading to the GARDEN via FRENCH DOORS. The SPACIOUS LOUNGE has plenty of room to relax in. Upstairs are FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS, b..."
"With its four bedrooms, the charming Stewart is perfect for anyone looking for extra space."
"The Elmford offers instant appeal with the LOUNGE, and KITCHEN DINING offering the flexibility to form one single space. Sharing the downstairs is a LAUNDRY ROOM, downstairs WC and DOUBLE GARAGE. Upstairs, TWO BEDROOMS ARE EN-SUITE, and A WALK-IN DRESSING AREA adds a luxury touch to the principal..."
A truly stunning 3 bedroom galleried apartment. With expansive living space and a versatile third bedroom on the upper gallery which could be used as a study or studio to fit your needs.
"Currently offered as fully furnished with a £20k LBTT contribution** A luxurious 3-bedroom duplex apartment with a stand-out double height living space and galleried third bedroom. Contact us to book your private Rettie & Co. viewing appointment, or attend the open..."
"Nestled in very heart of exclusive Stockbridge, this particularly spacious three-bedroom plus study, first-floor apartment is set within a B-listed Georgian tenement. Enjoying some of the finest amenities the capital has to offer, right on its doorstep, this prime city home will appeal to profess..."
Luxurious PENTHOUSE APARTMENT with CITY VIEWS and EXPANSIVE ROOF TERRACE. DESIGNER KITCHEN & BATHROOMS. Spacious OPEN PLAN LIVING. UNDERGROUND PARKING.
"Offering great kerb appeal, the four bedroom Maxwell has plenty of space for the whole family."
"Part of a Georgian B-listed palace terrace, this main-door duplex apartment has been converted to exceptional standards, blending historical charm and well-retained period ..."
"A charming double upper with garden, garage and open views. This wonderful first and second floor flat quietly enjoys an invaluable position in the heart of the south side of Edinburgh. External stairs, found to the side of the house provide main door access. In addition to off street parking, t..."
"A selection of two bedroom luxury homes, available to reserve off plan."
"A selection of two bedroom luxury garden apartments, available to reserve off plan."
"Two-bedroom apartments coming soon at a unique Waterside location minutes from the city centre. The Moorings development is part of one of Edinburgh's most exciting regeneration projects. It offers a luxury front-line development of 98 spacious 1, 2, 3 & 4 bedroom apartments, garden apartments w..."
"Plot 13 is the only 2-bedroom apartment on the top level. With a triple window feature, enjoy enviable views towards Edinburgh Castle and Arthur’s Seat. "
"Available for a move in summer 2023, Plot 13 boasts a studio designed kitchen and impressive panoramic views of Edinburgh Castle and Arthur's Seat.  "
"A beautifully renovated ground floor flat with a private terrace and off street parking. Located in the much sought after Merchiston district, this wonderful lower villa provides an excellent balance of accommodation. There are three good sized bedrooms, a generous bay fronted sitting room, two ..."
"This SPACIOUS FAMILY HOME has a generous OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN leading to the GARDEN via FRENCH DOORS. The kitchen incorporates DINING AND FAMILY AREAS and has an adjacent UTILITY ROOM. A SEPARATE LOUNGE has ample room for everyone to relax, and an INTEGRAL GARAGE provides added STORAGE SPACE. FOUR D..."
"Situated on a desirable corner plot in a quiet residential area of Cammo is this four bedroom detached property with garden, garage, and driveway. It boasts bright and appealing accommodation over two floors and has superb potential for extension or conversion of the loft (subject to the necessar..."
"Neilsons are delighted to offer on to the market this exceptionally appealing detached bungalow, which sits on a generous plot of garden ground, enjoying a superb location in ..."
"** FIXED PRICE £5,000 BELOW HOME REPORT VALUATION ** Spacious and stylish 1st floor apartment available in Cannonmills area with beautiful views over the water of Leith. This apartment has to be seen to fully appreciate all it has to offer. The open plan living area really has the wow factor. Th..."
This detached dorma-bungalow lies within the highly desirable Kingsknowe area to the south west of the city centre and is in ideal commuting distance by bus and rail services as well as being in proximity to the City Bypass and main motorway networks. The accommodation on offer within consists o...
"This is a SPACIOUS FAMILY HOME where light and space rule. The LOUNGE is bright and airy thanks to a GLAZED BAY with FRENCH DOORS leading to the GARDEN, while the OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN flows into a light-filled DINING AREA. A separate UTILITY ROOM, downstairs WC and INTEGRAL GARAGE also make this a p..."
"Highly desirable, city centre garden flat situated on Rutland Square. Includes two private allocated parking spaces and an under-pavement cellar."
"Neilsons are delighted to offer on to the market this charming and generously proportioned detached bungalow, which rests on substantial and beautifully kept garden grounds, ..."
"A most impressive four-bedroom townhouse, this property occupies a superb position in Edinburgh’s sought-after and iconic New Town, just a short walk from the fashionable neighbourhoods of Stockbridge and Canonmills. Situated on a peaceful cobbled street in a leafy cul-de-sac borderin..."
 BRAND NEW PENTHOUSE . Luxurious PENTHOUSE APARTMENT with STUNNING VIEWS and ROOF TERRACE. DESIGNER KITCHEN & BATHROOMS. Spacious OPEN PLAN LIVING. UNDERGROUND PARKING. 
"The Langwood - four-bedroom home, with SEPARATE STUDY, OPEN PLAN KITCHEN and DINING ROOM, with French doors to the garden. Upstairs, the PRINCIPAL BEDROOM with EN-SUITE and WALK-IN WARDROBE and further three bedrooms are ideal for any family."
"FIXED £15,000 BELOW HOME REPORT VALUE A fantastic drawing room flat located on a prime street in the West End of Edinburgh"
"The Maplewood - DETACHED family home with OPEN PLAN KITCHEN /FAMILY DINING. Separate lounge, with feature BAY WINDOW. Principal bedroom with EN-SUITE with double wardrobes. Flexible HOME OFFICE space."
A fabulous first floor flat part of a converted traditional detached villa situated in the prestigious Merchiston district of the city perfectly positioned for access to a wide ...
Stunning three-bedroom duplex in Gorgie
Fantastic opportunity to purchase a four bedroom second floor tenement flat located in the extremely popular Lonsdale Terrace in Edinburgh. This property offers flexible accommodation for couples and families as well as being incredibly convenient for the University. The flat is situated overlook...
A fantastic and rare opportunity has arisen to acquire this most impressive and beautifully presented bungalow that lies within the sought after Corstorphine area to the west of Edinburgh's city centre and benefits from easy access to many local amenities as well as to excellent transport links t...
Blair Cadell are delighted to bring to market this rarely available detached villa in the heart of Cammo. This light and spacious detached villa boasts ideal family sized ...
CLOSING DATE TUESDAY 04/04/23 @ 12 NOON An exceptional and unique modern detached bungalow offering bright and thoughtfully designed accommodation with a sunny private garden ...
"Neilsons are delighted to offer on to the market this exceptionally charming Victorian lower garden villa which forms part of a handsome period building, enjoying a fabulous ..."
"Picturesque, one of a kind, three-bedroom house in Edinburgh’s prestigious Comely Bank. Built in 1900 to accommodate the Headmaster of Flora Stevenson school. Comely Bank is in one of Edinburgh's most desired areas. Comely Bank Road links Stockbridge to Craigleith with Stockbridge offering a gre..."
"The Riverwood - FOUR BEDROOM home with flexible layout of KITCHEN/ DINING and SEPARATE LOUNGE. FRENCH DOORS to GARDEN. The PRINCIPAL BEDROOM features an EN-SUITE, while one of the remaining three bedrooms could become a useful a HOME OFFICE."
The wonderfully spacious 4 bedroom Geddes home is perfect for family living.
Immaculately presented four-bedroom townhouse in the highly desirable residential district of Corstorphine to the west of Edinburgh's city centre.This stunning home offers ...
"Are you looking for a traditional property in one of the most popular parts of Edinburgh? With traditional features galore and excellent local amenities, this could be the one for you.   "
This wonderful two bedroom conversion home positioned on the first floor within the majestic Playfair building enjoys views of the surrounding landscaped gardens and breath-taking chapel.
Closing Date Set Wed 5 April at 12noon - Simply Stunning Three Bed Maindoor Flat with Private Gardens.  This immaculately presented three bed maindoor flat is one of the ...
"A three-bedroom detached house situated in popular Duddingston, set within easy reach of Portobello and the city centre, and offering spacious accommodation and the possibility to extend and develop further (subject to consent). Representing an ideal home for families and city professionals, this..."
"35 Duddingston Park is an exceptionally bright and spacious 5-bedroom upper villa, forming the top two floors of a converted Victorian building. The property is within a short ..."
"Enjoy a highly sought-after Merchiston location with this most impressive four bedroom apartment. Bright and situated on the top floor of a traditional Victorian tenement it features charming period details and spectacular views. Set in the heart of a high amenity area, the property is in walking..."
"Located within Edinburgh's historic Georgian New Town, an elegant, spacious and attractively decorated 2nd floor traditional tenement flat offering bright and versatile ..."
"Superb 5 bedroom family home in the popular residential area of Prestonfield. This 1930 bungalow is in pristine condition throughout and is located on a quiet residential street, making it ideal for families who want peace and privacy while still being close to the city amenities. "
"Positioned in the desirable coastal suburb of Cramond, a short stroll from the beach, this generous detached twostorey home enjoys light and airy versatile interiors with ..."
Beautiful Four Bedroom Family Home in Edinburgh's Desirable Trinity
Traditional Garden Level Flat - Beautiful Location - 3 Double Bedrooms - Spacious Sitting Room - Kitchen - Private Front and Rear Garden - Family Bathroom - Traditional Features -Excellent Transport Links - Abundance of Local Amenities
"Enjoy a residential location with this impressive five-bedroom detached home in Barnton. Situated in a peaceful street with rear garden views over to the prestigious Royal Burgess Golf Club. It benefits from high-quality contemporary upgrades, enclosed gardens, a conservatory and garage. There ar..."
"St Vincent Street offers the rare opportunity to acquire an elegant three-bedroom apartment with corner aspect, situated on the second floor of a handsome tenement located on a desirable cobbled street in the heart of Edinburgh’s New Town. This historical property retains period features, i..."
"This is a bright, spacious and impressive four-bedroom, third floor flat situated in sought-after Marchmont, a short distance from Edinburgh’s city centre. With flexible and well-proportioned accommodation throughout it forms part of a traditional Victorian tenement and offers spectacular views o..."
"An extremely impressive detached house situated in a quiet street in the highly regarded area of Cammo. This superb property has been modernised by the present owners to offer a stylish walk in home which boasts a large rear garden, garage and monoblocked driveway. The property benefits from plan..."
"FINAL FLAT REMAINING within this exclusive new development in vibrant Morningside - first floor two bedrooms and bathrooms. No.7 Canaan Lane is an exciting new development of ten exceptional, one and two bedroom apartments (forecasted Energy Efficiency rating B) . Apartment three is a wonderf..."
LAST UNIT REMAINING in this elegant and contemporary development in the highly sought after area of Morningside. This high end and spacious two bedroom apartment lies on the first floor which can be accessed by communal lift or stairs. The large open plan kitchen and living area offers comforta...
Spacious and Modern Four Bedroom Townhouse in Edinburgh's Sought-after Fettes Cul-de-sac
"PLOT 7 IS A THREE BEDROOM APARTMENT SPLIT OVER TWO LEVELS WITH A LARGE OPEN PLAN KITCHEN, LIVING AND DINING ROOM AND TWO BATHROOMS. SPRINGWELL WILL BE AMA’S NEWEST EDINBURGH RESIDENTIAL DEVELOPMENT."
McEwan Fraser is delighted to present the bright and spacious double upper flat with a private front garden.
"Open Viewing Sunday 2-April from 2pm - 4pm or viewing by appointment, contact Watermans on | - with 360* Virtual Video Tour ..."
"Wonderful two bedroom apartment with a private terrace, in the wonderful Dean Village Fabulous two bedroom apartment set within an enviable position with access to the Water of Leith. Set within the hugely popular Dean Village Conservation area, the Bells Brae development consists of 10 unique ..."
"Investor purchase only, sale with tenants in situ. Connell and Connell are delighted to present to the market this well proportioned five bedroom double upper flat in a desirable residential area close to the City Centre."
"Located in a peaceful cul-de-sac this impressive 4/5 bedroom detached family house benefits from a lovely, secluded private garden, double garage and driveway. The property forms ..."
"With 4 bedrooms and a sociable kitchen diner, the detached Fraser is perfect if you're looking for a little extra space."
"*Closing date set for Friday 31st March 2023 at 12.00pm *Live an enviable beachfront lifestyle with this beautifully presented two-bedroom apartment situated directly on Portobello promenade, east of Edinburgh City Centre. Located on the second floor, the property boasts spectacular panoramic vie..."
"Impressive three bedroom penthouse apartment with either £5,000 towards LBTT or flooring throughout* This fabulous three bedroom penthouse apartment is perfect for those looking to move to an energy-efficient, low-maintenance home in Edinburgh. The Lerwick features a spectacular, dual-a..."
"This newly built three bedroom, ground floor apartment flat lies within AMA’s Springwell development and has been designed with your practicality and comfort in mind. Internally the flat comprises of an entrance hallway with plenty of storage to keep bits and bobs out of sight. Off the hallway t..."
"Beautifully refurbished 3 bedroom, 2nd floor apartment located in the heart of Edinburgh city centre, between George Street and Princes Street."
Luxurious one bedroom apartment at New Eidyn. Apt 2 is a beautifully crafted one bed apartment finished to the highest standard with an impressive specification. This stunning studio apartment offers a beautiful open plan space above the hustle and bustle of Edinburgh’s streets. ...
Entered from a magnificent marbled tiled ground floor this is a 2 double bedroom flat which sits comfortably within a block housing only 3 duplex apartments. 
"This second floor apartment with principal en suite features well-proportioned bedrooms and ample storage. The open plan living/kitchen/dining area hosts an island, ideal for socialising."
"Luxurious 2 bedroom apartment at Waverley Square. Contact us to book your private Rettie & Co. viewing appointment, or attend the open viewings on Thursdays from 3-7pm and Sundays from 12-4pm. Set in the heart of Edinburgh’s historic Old Town, a neighbourhood pepp..."
"New phase at The Engine Yard JUST RELEASED! . Two-bedroom, contemporary DUPLEX apartment with GARDEN in an excellent CITY LOCATION. SPACIOUS KITCHEN & BATHROOMS. EXPANSIVE OPEN PLAN LIVING."
"FULL MARKET VALUE PART EXCHANGE AVAILABLE. OR, WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS – IT’S ENTIRELY YOUR CHOICE. WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £25,749, PLUS WE’LL INCLUDE FLOORING OR WARDROBES.
An ideal family home designed over three floors. The ground floor makes th..."
"WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS – IT’S ENTIRELY YOUR CHOICE. WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £25,599, PLUS WE’LL INCLUDE FLOORING OR WARDROBES. OR, IF YOU NEED HELP SELLING YOUR CURRENT HOME, WE COULD OFFER 100% PART EXCHANGE.
A spacious family home, perfectly desi..."
Open viewings on Sunday between 2-4pmBlair Cadell are delighted to bring to market this fantastic four bed double upper that forms part of a traditional Victorian tenement. With ...
"Beautifully presented ground floor apartment forming part of a converted traditional semi villa, boasting a great mix of stylish modern fittings and fine period features, plus ..."
Spacious and extended semi-detached house with attractive garden and offering flexible family accommodation located in a popular residential area.
"The Leawood - four-bedroom home, with SEPARATE LOUNGE, OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING, with french doors leading to the garden. Upstairs, there are three bedrooms and a PRINCIPAL BEDROOM with built-in wardrobe and EN-SUITE."
"A beautifully presented Georgian flat. Leopold Place is a charming second floor flat, forming part of a handsome period terrace overlooking Calton Hill. The property has classic period proportions, fine period detailing and modern fixtures and fittings. The flat offers balanced living an..."
Exquisite Traditional Ground Floor Main Door Apartment which has been upgraded to a very high standard by the present owners.
Fixed at Home Report Value Fantastic opportunity to purchase a top floor flat in Edinburgh's desirable New Town.
"A well-presented three-bedroom, ground floor apartment in a prestigious, Applecross development in Craiglockhart. The spacious and light filled property offers comfortable, flexible, and attractive accommodation now in need of some modernisation. With a private garage, balcony, and landscaped gro..."
"Part exchange available! McEwan Fraser is delighted to present this spacious four-bedroom semi-detached house to the market. The property is ideally positioned in Cammo, a sought-after residential area in the catchment area for The Royal High School. Internally the property is presented in good o..."
"*FINAL HOME NOW REMAINING AT EDGELAW - ENJOY 5% DEPOSIT PAID. T'S & C'S APPLY * The ROSSIE has twin FRENCH DOORS to the family/dining area and kitchen open up the home to the GARDEN, bringing a light and airy feel to the home. Two EN-SUITE shower rooms to the bedrooms. DOUBLE GARAGE."
"Rarely available, beautifully presented and exceptionally spacious, three-bedroom, second (top) floor apartment. Set in an impressive 'B' listed Victorian college building conversion located in the Newington area, just south of Edinburgh city centre. The entrance vestibule offers space for out..."
"Enjoying a secluded location, surrounded by beautiful mature trees in the highly desirable Barnton district is this substantial, extended semi-detached house offering ideal family ..."
"About Rossie:With twin french doors, the dining and family room adjoining the kitchen has an exceptionally light, airy appeal. The elegant lounge features double doors and a bay window, and the five bedrooms include two en-suites. Key Features:Feature south bay window. Open plan kitchen family di..."
"WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS – IT’S ENTIRELY YOUR CHOICE. WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £24,999, PLUS WE’LL INCLUDE FLOORING OR WARDROBES.
OR, IF YOU'VE GOT A HOME TO SELL WE COULD BE YOUR GUARANTEED BUYER WITH FULL MARKET VALUE PART EXCHANGE.
An ideal family ..."
FINAL home of this style remaining - reserve Plot 121 today for 'Just The One' fee of £250*. 
"This 2 bed apartment offers a sleek, modern look and is generously proportioned. It features a master bedroom that comes with a walk-in wardrobe and an en-suite bathroom."
"Flat 5, 47 Timber Bush is a most impressive, spacious and luxurious duplex 3 bed en suite apartment located on the second and third floor of this impressive building. Quality contemporary finishings. Close to The Shore and new tram stop. Superb views."
"Fabulous two bedroom apartment in an enviable position with access to the Water of Leith. Fabulous two bedroom apartment set within an enviable position with access to the Water of Leith. Set within the hugely popular Dean Village Conservation area, the Bells Brae development consists of 10 uni..."
"Beautifully presented and spacious two-bedroom lower ground apartment occupying the garden level of a traditional Victorian townhouse in the heart of the West End. The property is within easy walking distance of Haymarket station, trams and the financial district as well as a wide selection of r..."
"This immaculate and timeless two-bedroom, first floor apartment forms part of a contemporary residential development from AMA Homes and is situated in the highly sought-after neighbourhood of Cramond. In turn-key condition, this property offers spacious accommodation with an open plan living area..."
A fantastic five bedroom family home offering flexible accommodation and a delightful south-facing garden.
"Luxurious two bedroom apartment at Waverley Square. Contact us to book your private Rettie & Co. viewing appointment, or attend the open viewings on Thursdays from 3-7pm and Sundays from 12-4pm. Set in the heart of Edinburgh’s historic Old Town, a neighbourhood pe..."
An extremely spacious and well-presented two-bedroom lower ground apartment forming part of a handsome blonde sandstone Victorian terrace in the city’s much sought-after West End. With a south-facing aspect the property is entered from an immaculate private front courtyard. Well...
"6 Rothesay Mews is a unique opportunity to acquire a stylish first floor, two double bedroom apartment with study, peacefully located in the heart of the West End within the New Two Conservation Area. In turn-key condition, this immaculate property offers spacious, flexible, open-plan accommodati..."
"A wonderful opportunity to acquire an unusual and ideally located building plot in one of Edinburgh’s most sought-after residential areas. Benefitting from full detailed planning to create a magnificent, three bedroom, detached home. The scheme for which the necessary planning pe..."
"The Larchwood- FOUR BEDROOM home with OPEN PLAN LIVING/ DINING and SEPARATE KITCHEN. FRENCH DOORS to GARDEN. The PRINCIPAL BEDROOM features an EN-SUITE, while the remaining three bedrooms offer flexibility to accommodate a HOME OFFICE."
"A selection of one bedroom luxury apartments, available to reserve off plan."
"Beautiful one-bedroom apartments @ The Moorings, Edinburgh Marina - A unique Waterside location. The Moorings development is part of one of Edinburgh's most exciting regeneration projects. It offers a luxury front-line development of 98 spacious 1, 2, 3 & 4 bedroom apartments, garden apartments ..."
"***Developers Warranty*** This modern apartment is situated on the second floor of a contemporary, factored development in desirable Cramond and boasts two bedrooms, a generous open-plan living area, a dining kitchen, a study, and two bathrooms, plus access to landscaped shared grounds and an ..."
"Particularly appealing double upper villa retaining fine period detail, offering spacious, comfortable and well planned accommodation on two levels and commanding fine westerly ..."
"An extremely light and spacious first floor apartment presented in immaculate condition, convenient for superb local amenities and access to city centre. Comprising an impressive first floor apartment which forms part of a splendid traditional stone built B listed Victorian building, pleasantl..."
"A beautiful, south facing one bedroom mezzanine apartment at The Playfair, Donaldson’s, a Category A listed building, ideally located in Edinburgh’s West End."
Blair Cadell are delighted to bring to market this immaculate four bed double upper flat in the heart of the tree colonies in Shandon. With generous living space and private ...
"84A Colinton Road is an impressive, elegant 3 public room, 2 bedroom lower conversion of a detached house situated in one of Edinburgh's most desirable residential areas.   The property is tasefully decorated and  presented to an exceptional standard with contemporary fittings and fixtures.  Ente..."
"With 3 bedrooms, the Chalmers is perfect for anyone looking for a little extra space."
"We could pay towards your mortgage, deposit or moving & running costs – it’s entirely your choice. We could contribute up to £24,999, plus we’ll include flooring or wardrobes. Click here for more details. Or, if you've got a home to sell we could be your guaranteed buyer with Part Exchange. A h..."
"Beautifully presented with attractive, modern interiors, neutral décor, and charming original features, this generously proportioned 2-bedroom, 2-bathroom flat is set on the third/top floor of a handsome, B-listed Victorian building in the city's West End, within the UNESCO World Heritage Site Ne..."
"Located on a newly renovated side-street in Edinburgh's highly sought-after Morningside area, Purplebricks are proud to present to the market this immaculately presented and well proportioned second floor apartment in a deceptively spacious development, offering bright and comfortable accommodati..."
"Located on the ground floor of this quiet and well-maintained development, situated in the popular residential area of Liberton, 3 miles south of Edinburgh city centre."
"Enjoy a sought-after Liberton location with this 1930s three-bedroom semi-detached stone and harled brick villa. The accommodation has been thoughtfully designed by the current owners to the needs of modern family living. Private front and rear garden, copious off-street parking and floored attic..."
The Douglas is a 4 bedroom home ideally situated to growing families or professional couples
The Douglas is a 4 bedroom home ideally situated to growing families or professional couples.
"We are proud to present this Five Bedroom Detached House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £475,000 - £515,000*"
"3D Tour Available, Situated in one of Edinburgh's most sought-after areas, this spacious and bright 2nd Floor Flat offers a perfect blend of period charm and superb city living. The large Victorian flat commands magnif..."
"2 Northlawn Terrace is a spacious, mid-terraced house in a quiet and secluded location with an integral double garage and well-kept communal gardens. Ground Floor: Entrance hall with storage cupboard; family room with patio doors to the gardens, double bedroom 2; double bedroom 3 with built-in-wa..."
Two bedroom second floor apartment with lift access and views to Fife and beyond in the West End
"This rarely available, second-floor apartment is part of a stunning, B-listed, Baronial-style villa dated 1868. The unique and characterful home enjoys generous accommodation, ..."
Experience a peaceful and picturesque setting with this generously proportioned four/five-bedroom duplex in prestigious Colinton. Located within an exclusive modern development on the banks of The Water of Leith and minutes from Colinton Village. It offers spacious and versatile family accommodat...
"Warners are delighted to present to market this generously proportioned four bedroom first floor apartment, forming part of a traditional Victorian era stone built tenement ..."
A spacious apartment with two outdoor areas. The private garden is accessed via the open plan living area while the private balcony can be accessed through bedrooms 2 & 3.
"OFFERED £10,000 BELOW HOME REPORT VALUATION. A spacious modern terraced townhouse overlooking Bruntsfield Golf Course and with views to Fife. The property is quietly positioned just off Easter Park Drive in the Barnton area to the west of the city centre. The house offers flexible and spaci..."
" Rarely on the market and highly sought after, is 4, Burdiehouse Road, located on the southern edge of Liberton. This is a substantial, detached stone villa, with mature gardens, an attached garage and off-street parking, which has been extended, offering extensive and versatile family accommo..."
"Closing date set for Monday 3rd April at 11am.Peacefully located in the highly sought after residential area of Trinity, 18 Easter Warriston is an impressive 4-bedroom link ..."
"* OPEN HOUSE - SUNDAY 2ND OF APRIL 2-4PM * Beautifully presented four bedroom double upper traditional tenement flat (INTERNAL SIZE - 134 SQM), available for sale in this highly sought-after area of Bellevue. Boasting stunning south facing views towards Calton Hill and Arthur Seat. "
"35 Redford Avenue is a spacious family home in a popular residential location. The versatile accommodation extends to 4 bedrooms, dining kitchen and bay windowed living room. The property has off-street parking to the front and a south facing, enclosed garden to the rear. Welcoming hall with unde..."
"Fixed Price - Enjoying a central location in a traditional tenement building, this spacious third floor flat is located in the popular district of Newington, in the South of Edinburgh. A short distance from the City Centre, the location offers a great selection of local shops and amenities. The p..."
"Attractive three-bedroom detached villa with private driveways, located within the sought-after residential location of Corstorphine, close to excellent local amenities, schooling, and commuter links."
"McEwan Fraser is delighted to bring this beautifully presented two-bedroom drawing room flat to the market. The property is presented to the market in superb internal order and offers an elegant and spacious living space. As is typical with this type of property, there are high ceilings, wonderfu..."
"Plot C1.04  is an impressive, low carbon, 3-bedroom 1st floor apartment within the groundbreaking Rowanbank Gardens development brought to you by award-winning Artisan Real Estate. MARKETING SUITE NOW OPEN"
"39 (2F1) or flat 3 Lauderdale Street is a well-presented two-bedroom second floor flat with box room, situated in the desirable Marchmont area. The location is superb with excellent local amenities, schools, and universities, and is a convenient distance from the city centre & surrounding are..."
"A spacious corner apartment situated on the ground floor enjoys open plan kitchen, living, dining area, three double bedrooms with principal en suite and private terrace."
"The 4 bedroom PRINGLE is a fantastic home with OPEN-PLAN kitchen/dining, STUDY, lounge with BAY WINDOW, master and second bedroom with EN-SUITE, further two bedrooms, FAMILY bathroom"
"Clyde Property welcomes to the market, this truly spacious two bed third floor apartment located on Newhaven Harbour offering stunning views over the Firth of Fourth via private balcony. The communal lift leads to the third floor where you will find the entrance to the flat. Entered via s..."
"This exclusive, three-bedroom, second-floor apartment forms part of a stunning, B-listed, Scots baronial-style building (1867-9) in highly sought-after Greenbank. The charming home offers bright and spacious accommodation that is characterised by high ceilings and light neutral décor, whic..."
"An exceptional two-bedroom Georgian apartment located in Edinburgh’s New Town. Abercromby Place, a luxurious top floor apartment that offers stunning views of Edinburgh and Fife. This beautiful two-bedroom, two-bathroom apartment is perfect for those seeking a high-end living experience in the h..."
Enjoy a prime location with this three-bedroom top floor apartment in leafy Marchmont. This light filled property boasts spacious and well-presented accommodation with spectacular open views across the Meadows to Edinburgh Castle. Situated within a traditional tenement with a shared rear garden a...
"A spacious corner apartment situated on the first floor boasts large private balcony accessed through the open plan kitchen, living, dining area perfect for entertaining or relaxing."
"About Pringle:The lounge extends from an attractive bay window through elegant double doors, into the light-filled dining kitchen and family room, creating an attractive and flexible living space. A separate study and two en-suite shower rooms add a touch of prestige to comfort. Key Features:Feat..."
"100% PART EXCHANGE AVAILABLE. OR, WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS – IT’S ENTIRELY YOUR CHOICE. WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £22,799, PLUS WE’LL INCLUDE FLOORING OR WARDROBES.
The Newmachar is intelligently designed over three storeys, French doors leading to the..."
"Open Viewing Sunday 2-4 pm Set on a leafy street in Burdiehouse Village surrounded by garden grounds, this generous detached bungalow enjoys two reception areas, a large kitchen, three bedrooms, an en-suite shower room, and a bathroom, plus a detached tandem garage with partly fitted units, ..."
A sophisticated 2 bedroom apartment with en-suite. The property has an airy open plan living / kitchen / dining area that allows for an open environment with lots of natural light.
"Plot C0.03  is an impressive, low carbon, 3-bedroom ground floor apartment within the groundbreaking Rowanbank Gardens development brought to you by award-winning Artisan Real Estate. MARKETING SUITE NOW OPEN"
"FIXED PRICE £20K BELOW HOME REPORT Elegant and spacious two-bedroom apartment, occupying the first floor of a traditional Victorian building in the heart of the West End. In turn-key condition, this property is in immaculate condition with key original features such as expansive ..."
"The Cullen is a stylish FOUR BEDROOM HOME. The ground floor offers a GENEROUS LOUNGE, AN OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN/DINING AREA WITH FRENCH DOORS to the garden, a UTILITY ROOM AND WC. The first floor comprises THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS, WITH BEDROOM 1 FEATURING AN EN SUITE SHOWER ROOM, A SINGLE BEDROOM, COMPU..."
"£20,000 below home report valuation! An extremely impressive end terraced mews style property with easily maintained private courtyard garden, which is enviably located on quiet cobbled street in the heart of the New Town, which is within walking distance of excellent local amenities ..."
"Flat 1, is a most impressive, spacious and luxurious 2 bed en suite apartment located on the first floor of this impressive building. Substantial ceiling heights, large sash and case windows are combined with quality contemporary finishings. Close to The Shore and new tram stop."
"A spacious and bright three bedroom ground floor apartment benefiting from a terrace and garage, located in the ever sought after area of The Grange."
Attractive detached Bungalow with mature gardens located in the highly sought after Barnton area of Edinburgh close to excellent local amenities.  CLOSING DATE 05/04/2023 AT 12PM
"A beautiful 1 bedroom duplex, positioned on the first floor within the stunning Playfair building. The apartment is sold with one allocated parking space in the secure underground car park."
"PART EXCHANGE AVAILABLE! McEwan Fraser is delighted to present this magnificent late Georgian flat to the market. Located in the New Town conservation area, the property occupies the third/top floor of a B-listed tenement which was designed by the prominent architect James Gillespie Graham. Inter..."
"This traditional, three-bedroom detached bungalow is ideally situated in Corstorphine, positioned conveniently close to a wealth of amenities, including shops, schools, excellent transport links, and scenic open spaces, and is also just under five miles from the heart of the capital. The home enj..."
Delightful residential building plot with the benefit of existing planning consent for an incredible family home in Colinton. 
"This elegant and beautifully presented two bedroom ground floor flat situated on Learmonth Terrace in the prestigious West End of Edinburgh, a walk or bus ride from Princes Street and George Street. The flat is entered via a large hallway with entry on the right to the fantastic open plan..."
"Forming part of an exclusive walled development with residents parking and landscaped grounds is this superb second floor flat, which also has a private garage. Situated in the ..."
"An excellent opportunity has arisen to acquire this beautiful, light, and spacious 3-bedroom extended semi- detached villa situated within a much sought after residential area ..."
"Beautifully presented, four-bedroom detached home forming part of a modern development in the popular residential area of the Wisp.This stunning family home offers well-planned ..."
"A superb and spacious three bedroom, ground floor apartment in an attractive contemporary development by Cala Homes. Located in the city’s popular Hillside district, handy ..."
"The Crombie is an impressive four bedroom detached home with an integral garage. The entrance hallway takes you to the front-facing lounge and to the back of the house where you'll find the open-plan kitchen/dining room with a family area. 
 
A utility room and WC are located just off the kitchen..."
The Crombie is an impressive four bedroom detached home with an integral garage. The entrance hallway takes you to the front-facing lounge and to the back of the house where you'll find the open-plan kitchen/dining room with a family area.  A utility room and WC are located just off the kitchen ...
"Situated in a prime location in Edinburgh's highly regarded West End, this two-bedroom top(second) floor flat, forms part of a handsome B-Listed Georgian style terrace, a stone's throw from Haymarket train station and Edinburgh's bustling West End."
"100% PART EXCHANGE AVAILABLE. OR, WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS – IT’S ENTIRELY YOUR CHOICE. WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £22,299, PLUS WE’LL INCLUDE FLOORING OR WARDROBES.
The Newmachar is intelligently designed over THREE STOREYS, FRENCH DOORS leading to the..."
Fantastic opportunity to purchase a brand new town house that is part of David Wilson Homes beautiful development at Cammo Meadows in Edinburgh. The town houses are ideal for family living designed over three floors with the ground floor making a perfect family hub with kitchen which is upgraded...
"An exciting opportunity has arisen to acquire this stunning, four-bedroom detached family home boasting a large, private rear garden and offering well-planned and flexible ..."
"A spacious and contemporary, two bedroom, second floor apartment forming part of the exclusive Quartermile development set in the south of Edinburgh’s city centre. Situated in one of the modern blocks, the property offers bright, open-plan living with an allocated garaged parking space and ..."
"Open Viewing Sunday 2-4pm. This tastefully presented detached bungalow with attic conversion and separate one bedroom annexe is located in Burdiehouse in south Edinburgh, close to convenient local amenities, the City Bypass and public transport links to the city centre. The accommodation co..."
"A lovely one bedroom apartment positioned on the ground floor of the stunning Playfair building, with views towards the central courtyard."
"Set in the heart of Marchmont and boasting breath-taking views over The Meadows, Castle and Arthur’s Seat is this immaculately presented top floor traditional apartment. Nestled ..."
"Located in the desirable residential area of Polwarth, this stunning 3 bedroom main door flat forms part of a traditional Victorian tenement. The property lies within walking ..."
"48 Wakefield Avenue is a well-presented, bright and spacious 4-bedroom semi-detached house offering flexible accommodation over 2 floors. Situated East of Edinburgh City ..."
"Plot B0.02 is an impressive, low carbon, 3-bedroom ground floor apartment within the groundbreaking Rowanbank Gardens development brought to you by award-winning Artisan Real Estate. MARKETING SUITE NOW OPEN"
Purplebricks are proud to bring to the market this rare opportunity to purchase this stunning four-bedroom bungalow in the popular residential area of Craigentinny Road. Accommodation Comprises ~ The property has a large open plan living room with space for a dining table along with a beautifu...
"Plot A4.01  is an impressive, low carbon, 3-bedroom 4th floor apartment within the groundbreaking Rowanbank Gardens development brought to you by award-winning Artisan Real Estate. MARKETING SUITE NOW OPEN"
"Located in the prestigious residential area of Murrayfield, this truly impressive first floor apartment forms part of an exclusive conversion (Square and Crescent). The ..."
"This lovely semi-detached villa is brought to the market providing a splendid family home located in a highly-regarded residential area in Edinburgh.   The accommodation comprises: on the ground floor: a welcoming entrance hall, a spacious dual-aspect lounge/diningroom with a large wind..."
"An excellent opportunity has arisen to acquire this superb three bedroom first floor apartment with garage, situated in the prestigious Merchiston district of the city, perfectly ..."
Spacious Three Bedroom End Terraced House in Edinburgh's Sought After Craigleith Area
"Extended 1930s semi-detached villa which is well presented and in excellent order throughout and benefits from private mature gardens and garage. It would make a fantastic family home, particularly given the proximity of excellent schools and amenities. It also has double glazing and gas central ..."
"At sought after address, a superbly spacious traditional TOP FLOOR FLAT with current HMO Licence. Hallway, bay lounge, large dining kitchen, utility, three bedrooms and bathroom. * Wednesday and Sunday viewing.*"
Central ground floor one bed flat
"The Tantallon is a bright and spacious family home designed for flexible living. A spacious entrance hallway leads to a downstairs bedroom/home office, the lounge, WC and open-plan kitchen/dining roomwith the added benefit of a utility room. French doors open out from the kitchen into the back ga..."
Buy-to-Let Opportunity | Prime Edinburgh City Centre Real Estate | Tenant Currently Situated | 2 Bedroom Flat | Open Plan Lounge | Garden Room | Edinburgh City Centre Location
"CLOSING DATE - TUESDAY 4 APRIL AT 11AMBeautifully presented top floor apartment with 3 bedrooms, forming part of an elegant mid-terraced Victorian building, quietly positioned in ..."
"Neilsons are delighted to offer on to the market this exceptionally charming second floor flat forming part of an impressive tree lined Victorian Terrace, located in ..."
"Part Exchange available! McEwan Fraser are delighted to present this beautiful three bedroom double upper flat to the market. The property has retained a wealth of period character and is presented to the market in excellent condition. Alongside well-proportioned living accommodation, the propert..."
"Charming elevated main door flat enhanced by fine period features and natural wood finishes, boasting its own private front and rear gardens, forming part of a red sandstone ..."
"Neilsons are delighted to offer on to the market this superb development opportunity, which forms part of a handsome period terrace located in the capitals desirable Newington ..."
An impressive two-bedroom B-listed Georgian apartment situated in a prime corner position in the heart of desirable Stockbridge. The spacious lounge with period features and bay windows overlooking North West Circus Place and the expansive kitchen/ dining room with original flagstone flooring set...
10/4 Grosvenor Street is a spacious 4 bedroom top floor flat with incredible views across Edinburgh and the Pentland Hills. The property is well decorated throughout in bright fresh colours and is flooded in natural light by the numerous skylights. The property is entered via the second-floor hal...
"This new build southwest facing, second floor apartment forms part of an impressive contemporary development, located in the heart of Edinburgh’s desirable Corstorphine ..."
"65 2F2 Spottiswoode Street is a spacious 2nd floor flat within a traditional Victorian tenement. The well-presented property retains many original details such as elegant cornicing and fireplaces, and is conveniently located for both Edinburgh University and the city centre."
Well Presented Second Floor Flat - Lift Access - 3 Double Bedrooms - 2 Bathrooms (1 En Suite) - Sitting Room with Large Bay Window - Kitchen - Private Garage - Excellent Storage 
"Newly launched, Temple Park is a contemporary, sustainable residential development situated on the banks of Union Canal overlooking Pentland Hills to the west and the historic Edinburgh City Centre skyline to the east. A unique collection of 1, 2 and 3 bedroom apartments and a stunning..."
"A fantastic opportunity has arisen to purchase this impressive Victorian end-terraced house with private garden, situated within the heart of Corstorphine, close to excellent ..."
"Located in the Marchmont conservation area, this traditional, two-bedroom (plus box room), second-floor flat has an enviable position, set within easy walking distance of The Meadows, Edinburgh University, and a wide choice of amenities. The south-facing property is in excellent decorative order ..."
"88 Milton Road West is a bright and spacious detached bungalow, situated east of Edinburgh city centre in the popular district of Duddingston. With superb development potential, ..."
The Dean is a spacious four bedroom home with an integral garage. The entrance hallway leads to a large front-aspect lounge. To the back of the home you will find an open-plan kitchen with dining and family areas and French doors leading onto the back garden. A useful utility room and WC complete...
Show home now open. An impressive three-bedroom apartment with a seamless open plan living design.
"41 (Flat 4) York Place is a beautifully refurbished 1 bedroom, second floor apartment in the heart of Edinburgh's New Town."
"NEW FIXED PRICE - Recently updated to give a bright, modern feeling, this lovely two bedroom double upper flat is set over the second and third floors of an attractive period ..."
"With all the benefits of city centre living on the immediate doorstep, 84 Comely Bank Avenue is a spacious and bright main door tenement flat located in the popular Comely Bank ..."
"Plot A1.02 is an impressive, low carbon, 3-bedroom 1st floor apartment within the groundbreaking Rowanbank Gardens development brought to you by award-winning Artisan Real Estate. MARKETING SUITE NOW OPEN"
Show home now open. Style C2 is an impressive three-bedroom apartment with a seamless open plan living design.
"WE CAN HELP ARRANGE THE SALE OF YOUR EXISTING HOME AND EVEN PAY YOUR ESTATE AGENT FEES WITH OUR MOVEMAKER SCHEME. LET'S MAKE YOUR MOVE TO LIME GROVE HASSLE-FREE. SPEAK TO A SALES ADVISER FOR FULL DETAILS.
The Dunbar is a spacious four bedroom home. With a large lounge at the front and an open-pla..."
"The property has been INDEPENDENTLY VALUED at £130,000 by a Royal Institution of Chartered Surveyors (RICS) qualified surveyor. CASH BUYERS ONLY This first floor flat has a huge amount of potential to offer it's new owners. With three well-proportioned bedrooms, a living room, a fitted kit..."
"Apartment seven is one of the desirable two bedroom apartments in the newly-built part of the development. The apartment benefits from a large folding French doors and Juliet balcony in the living/dining area offering leafy views over the garden and tree-lined canal. A large bathroom, ample stora..."
"Tastefully presented and spacious, three-bedroom, end-terrace house, with gardens and a garage. Located in the desirable Murrayfield area, just west of Edinburgh city centre. A bright entrance vestibule, with space for outerwear, opens into a hallway, finished with light, neutral decor and the..."
"The seamless layout of the open plan space combines the lounge, dining and kitchen creating an inviting space to relax and unwind after a hard day."
A stylish second floor apartment with private balcony accessed via the open plan living/kitchen/dining area complete with 2 double bedrooms. All homes are incredibly efficient and A-rated.
"An extremely impressive semi detached bungalow with superb modern fitted kitchen, conservatory, enclosed private garden and off street parking. This wonderful property offers flexible family accommodation over two floors and is situated in quiet street in highly regarded and sought after residen..."
"Sitting on Ardmillan Terrace, where Gorgie and Dalry meet. Plot 46 is ideally positioned to take advantage of all these areas have to offer. This newly built two bedroom second floor flat lies within AMA’s Springwell development and has been designed with your practicality and comfort in mind. "
"Situated on the highly desirable first floor this two bedroom apartment features open plan living, fitted wardrobes to both bedrooms, principle en suite and spacious private balcony."
"Nestled around the Water of Leith, surrounded by lush established trees complete with allocated parking and private balcony. All homes are incredibly efficient and A-rated."
"The Warriston is the perfect home for larger families, with five bedrooms, three bathrooms, plenty of living space and the bonus of an integral garage. The Warriston features a front-aspect lounge, a large kitchen/dining room with direct access to the garden, a utility room and a useful cloakroom."
"With an open plan kitchen/living area leading to the private balcony, reserve Plot 140 for 'Just The One' fee of £250 GBP*. "
"Nestled around the Water of Leith this two bedroom ground floor apartment offers stylish open plan living, kitchen, dining area with private terrace, family bathroom and principal en suite."
"Nestled around the Water of Leith this two bedroom ground floor apartment offers stylish open plan living, kitchen, dining area with private terrace, family bathroom and principle en suite."
"This stylish, newly-constructed fourth/top-floor flat is an attractive purchase for any buy to let investor, currently achieving 5.6% rental yield. The property is fully HMO compliant and is currently let as a three bedroom HMO.The property boasts three double bedrooms and versatile box bedroom, ..."
Attractive four bedroom chalet style villa which has been extended upstairs and to the rear to create a generously proportioned family home.  It is situated at the end of a quiet cul de sac and has a substantial site and gardens.  It is well presented and in excellent order throughout.  It has a ...
"Rarely available substantial three-bedroom main upper villa of immense appeal, which boasts generously sized mature side and rear gardens and enjoys stunning views towards the ..."
This is a substantial top-floor two-bedroom flat with a boxroom in a Victorian sandstone tenement in the highly desirable and prestigious Bruntsfield district of Edinburgh.
"Warners are delighted to present to market this exceptionally light and spacious main door ground floor apartment with a private front terrace, forming part of an impressive ..."
"Set on a quiet street, moments from excellent amenities, quick transport links, Portobello Beach and Arthur’s Seat is this immaculately presented main door upper villa. Boasting ..."
Wonderfully presented top floor flat in the sought after West End of Edinburgh.
"Immaculately presented two-bedroom first floor flat, forming part of a B-Listed converted Georgian terraced townhouse, situated in the desirable New Town. The location is superb with excellent local amenities and schools and is a convenient distance from the city centre & surrounding areas. T..."
"Impressive, cleverly extended detached family villa with delightful private gardens including a large sunny south-west facing rear garden, double driveway and single garage, ..."
"With a low maintenance garden and generous storage throughout, reserve Plot 98 for 'Just The One' fee of 250 GBP*."
Enjoy flexible living in this stylish penthouse complete with an allocated parking space and private terrace. Reserve Plot 275 for 'Just The One' fee of £250*.
Spacious four bedroom detached house in sought after area with large garden and scope to expand.
"The Oakmont is an expansive family home which boasts a contemporary, open-plan kitchen/breakfast area with French doors to the rear garden and a utility room/clock room. Upstairs there are 4 double bedrooms with an en suite and fitted wardrobe to bedroom 1 plus a modern family bathroom for the rest"
"Boasting an exclusive New Town address, this stylish first-floor flat, with two bedrooms and a dual-level living area, lies on the first floor of a handsome B-Listed Victorian townhouse, within strolling distance of Princes Street and has access to Drumsheugh Gardens (subject to a fee). This desi..."
"Enviably located in Edinburgh’s New Town conservation area, this main-door duplex apartment forms part of an A-listed building with Greek Revival architecture, designed in 1820 ..."
"Designed to accommodate modern lifestyles, the 3 bedroom Blair will suit couples and families alike."
"The Gourock is an terraced home with a traditional look on the outside, yet designed for modern family life on the inside. French doors leading to the rear garden allow light to stream in, making the lounge and dining area bright and airy. A separate fitted kitchen overlooks the front garden. Ups..."
"A most charming and attractively presented main door, mews style property with sitting room, modern open plan kitchen with breakfast bar and integrated appliances, two bedrooms ..."
"Benefitting from a large garden, this significantly extended semi-detached house offers superb family accommodation in a popular & peaceful location close to schools and ..."
"Rarely available, light and well-presented, two-bedroom, mid-terrace house with an integrated garage. Located on a quiet, cobbled side street in Edinburgh's desirable New Town area, in the heart of the city centre. The front door opens directly into a spacious open-plan area, finished wit..."
"A historic and desirable Edinburgh Old Town location, this spectacular one-bedroom apartment at the award-winning Quartermile development forms the second floor of an original turreted Royal Infirmary building"
"An exciting opportunity has arisen to acquire this beautiful three-bedroom, ground floor flat forming part of a contemporary development, boasting access to a charming patio and ..."
"Stylish and spacious triple aspect first floor apartment in a small modern development with attractive and well maintained communal garden grounds, including a children's playpark, and located close to the City Centre."
"*FIXED £15K BELOW HR* Located within the James Gillespie's Primary School and James Gillespie's High School catchments. Spacious traditional two-bedroom first floor flat within a Victorian tenement, in the sought after Marchmont area of Edinburgh. HMO Compli..."
"Boasting a private patio to extend your living space and a high specification throughout, reserve Plot 136 for 'Just The One' fee of £250 GBP*. "
"Luxurious one bedroom apartment at Waverley Square. Contact us to book your private Rettie & Co. viewing appointment, or attend the open viewings on Thursdays from 3-7pm and Sundays from 12-4pm. Set in the heart of Edinburgh’s historic Old Town, a neighbourhood pe..."
"Closing date Tuesday 4th April @ 12 noon. A must on your viewing list McDougall McQueen present to the market this fabulous, bright and spacious four bedroom townhouse offering excellent modern day family accommodation arranged over three floors, with a private rear garden and secure underground ..."
"Immaculately presented end of terrace, double upper Victorian colony apartment with four bedrooms, private garden and driveway quietly positioned on a residential street in the ..."
"This two-bedroom (plus box room), secondfloor flat forms part of a traditional tenement building that is enviably located in the heart of prestigious Morningside, a stone’s ..."
"This desirable 1 bedroom apartment comes with a spacious bedroom and bathroom. It features a generous open plan living / kitchen / dining, perfect for relaxing or entertaining."
"Superb traditional detached bungalow boasting well presented and spacious family sized accommodation and a large, south west facing private garden. The property enjoys a peaceful ..."
"The CARLTON - a striking THREE-BEDROOM home with SEPARATE LOUNGE, beautifully lit by windows at either end, shares the ground floor with a dual aspect kitchen featuring FRENCH DOORS in the DINING AREA leading to the garden. A SEPARATE LAUNDRY room aids household management, and the stunning EN-SU..."
"Substantial, Victorian double upper flat with an abundance of living and entertaining space as well as an attic and a private garden. The property boasts a wealth of original ..."
"A stylish one bedroom apartment situated on the second floor at Waverley Square. This contemporary home offers open plan living and kitchen area, ample storage and secure video entry system."
Well-Presented Top Floor Flat - 2 Double Bedrooms - Desirable Area - South-Facing Sitting Room - Spacious Kitchen/Dining Room - Study/Box Room - Utility Room - Communal Rear Garden - Traditional Features - Excellent Local Amenities 
"FIXED PRICE £390,000 (£10k Below HR Value) and quick sale required.Flat 4, 1 Smiddy Wynd is a gorgeous example of a 3 bedroom 1st floor apartment set within a bespoke Square & ..."
"Beautifully presented top floor flat forming part of a traditional Victorian stone tenement in the heart of Marchmont, with a magnificent outlook and views of Edinburgh Castle. It has many original period features such as cornicing and lovely high ceilings, and with the windows with various aspec..."
"Currently offering a full LBTT payment** Luxurious one bedroom apartment at Waverley Square. Contact us to book your private Rettie & Co. viewing appointment, or attend the open viewings on Thursdays from 3-7pm and Sundays from 12-4pm. Set in the heart of Edi..."
"If you’re looking for a turnkey city pad with the optional extras of city centre parking and a fully interior designed furniture package, this one-bedroom apartment at Waverley Square will hit the mark. The one-bedroom show home has been professionally designed by industry exper..."
"The Whithorn is a lovely four-bedroom family home that features a bright lounge with a triple window, a kitchen/dining room with French doors, a utility room and a downstairs cloakroom. Bedroom one is en suite, bedrooms two and three share a Jack and Jill bathroom and there's a family bathroom too."
"The property comprises a traditional, attractively presented 2nd floor conversion within a fine Victorian terrace and located in the heart of Edinburgh’s popular and renowned ..."
"** NEW TO THE MARKET ** This magnificent property offers the rare opportunity to acquire a remarkable two-bedroom, first floor apartment, forming part of the iconic, B-listed, Dalry House. This mansion was originally built in 1661 and was restored in 1966 as a day centre, in which it w..."
"Fabulously situated in Edinburgh’s prestigious Marchmont, this three-bedroom top floor apartment, is a fantastic opportunity to acquire a spacious, well-proportioned, and bright traditional property featuring a number of original period features. Close to open green spaces, well-regarded schoolin..."
"This well-presented garden flat with private, walled garden is located in Newington, a popular area slightly south of Edinburgh city centre. The property is perfectly located for access to Edinburgh University, Arthur's Seat and a variety of shops, cafes, restaurants and bars. The accommodatio..."
"£10,000 below home report valuation. A superbly located two-bedroom flat in the heart of Edinburgh’s sought-after New Town. Abercromby Place is regarded as one of the finest streets in the city and is a short walk to George Street, Princes Street and the new St James Quarter. Fashiona..."
"If you’re looking for a turnkey city pad with the optional extras of city centre parking, this one-bedroom apartment at Waverley Square will hit the mark. The one-bedroom show home has been professionally designed by industry experts to present a high-end boho city vibe within t..."
"READY NOW - Plot 170 Two bedroom, 961 sqft, MODERN apartment with Balcony in an excellent CITY LOCATION. OPEN PLAN kitchen/living area. Double bedrooms with FITTED WARDOBES. "
"A fantastic opportunity has arisen to purchase this outstanding maisonette apartment providing spacious living on both the ground and first floor levels. Forming part of the modern Urban Eden development, the apartment provides bright and spacious accommodation with feature double height lounge,..."
"This bright and spacious main-door duplex flat is located in the popular district of Newington, in the South of Edinburgh. A short distance from the City Centre, the location offers a great selection of local shops, restaurants and amenities. The property is conveniently located for many Unive..."
A great opportunity to purchase a ground floor two-bedroom flat in the highly desirable Stockbridge area of Edinburgh
"Forming part of a C-listed former church on Commercial Street in Leith, this generous first-floor flat offers spacious and flexible accommodation including an open-plan living area, three bedrooms, an en-suite shower room, a bathroom, and a study, all enhanced by minimalist décor. Externally, the..."
"With flexible living, a private balcony off the lounge and excellent storage, reserve Plot 256 for 'Just The One' fee of 250 GBP*."
"4 Bedroom House on a Fantastic Plot.  Eligible for OMSE LIFT scheme.                        This fantastic house is set in a quiet cul-de-sac, close to local amenities and a short distance to the transport links. This well-pro..."
"Elegant main door apartment with 2 double bedrooms, forming part of a traditional building, situated in a sought-after location close to excellent local amenities and the City ..."
A well-presented top floor flat forming part of a traditional tenement building in the vibrant Morningside district of the City.  The property is perfectly positioned for access ...
"Built in the 19th century, this impressive building boasts Victorian style on the outside, and contemporary style on the inside. Cala's sensitive re-development of this iconic building ensure that all homes remain sympathetic to their historic surroundings."
"We'll help you move to our last remaining Durris house type with Movemaker. We could help you arrange your sale and pay your estate agent fees. Speak to a Sales Adviser for full details.
The Durris is intelligently designed over THREE STOREYS. There is plenty of space in the OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN/DIN..."
"Rare opportunity to acquire most desirable Traditional Town Flat, 2nd floor, set amidst Edinburgh's highly regarded ""Comely Bank"". Well proportioned 2 Bedroom accom' with development potential (subject to planning etc). Viewing highly recommended"
"IF YOU'VE GOT A HOME TO SELL BEFORE YOU MOVE, WE COULD HELP TO ARRANGE YOUR SALE AND PAY YOUR ESTATE AGENT FEES WITH OUR MOVEMAKER SCHEME. SPEAK TO A SALES ADVISER FOR FULL DETAILS.
The Fenton is a combination of stylish, modern and spacious. The KITCHEN is a perfect space for entertaining as its..."
"Brand-new release at The Engine Yard. Two-bedroom, LUXURY fourth floor apartment in an excellent CITY LOCATION. JULIETTE BALCONY with STUNNING VIEWS of Edinburgh. SPACIOUS OPEN PLAN LIVING. "
"BRAND NEW HOMES at The Engine Yard! . Plot 177 Two-bedroom 851 sqft, MODERN apartment in an excellent CITY LOCATION. OPEN PLAN kitchen/living area with PRIVATE BALCONY. Double bedrooms with FITTED WARDOBES. "
A stylish first floor apartment with private balcony accessed via the open plan living/kitchen/dining area complete with 2 double bedrooms. All homes are incredibly efficient and A-rated.
"A stunning first floor apartment, nestled around the Water of Leith, surrounded by lush established trees complete with allocated parking. All homes are incredibly efficient and A-rated."
"New phase at The Engine Yard JUST RELEASED! . Two-bedroom, CONTEMPORARY apartment in an excellent CITY LOCATION. OPEN PLAN kitchen/living area with PRIVATE BALCONY. Double bedrooms with FITTED WARDOBES. "
"Enviably situated in the heart of sought-after Bruntsfield, 4F2 172 Bruntsfield Place is a well-presented three-bedroom apartment on the fourth floor of a traditional sandstone tenement. With generous accommodation, the property boasts a bright bay windowed corner living room, a contem..."
"This two-bedroom (plus box room) first-floor flat forms part of a traditional tenement building in the sought-after Bruntsfield conservation area, set close to Bruntsfield Links, local amenities, and transport links. It offers spacious accommodation, and is presented in neutral tones throughout, ..."
"Just a short stroll to beautiful Inverleith park and the vibrant cafe culture of Stockbridge, is this stunning two-bedroom Victorian tenement flat, in desirable Comely Bank. This second-floor flat offers exceptionally splendid proportions in a fantastic location. The property is brimming with ..."
"23 (GF1) Morningside Place is an elegant one-bedroom ground floor flat, forming part of a traditional detached Victorian villa, with study and private south-facing front gardens. Situated in the highly desirable Morningside area, the location is superb with excellent local amenities and schools a..."
"Fixed at Home Report Valuation Beautifully presented three bedroom apartment with balcony and private garage, set within an attractive residential development in Barnton. "
"The welcoming hallway leads to the open plan lounge, dining & kitchen – the perfect space for entertaining. Relax within the sumptuous principal bedroom which boasts a dressing area."
Enjoy a sought-after location with this impressive two-bedroom apartment situated in Edinburgh’s prestigious Bruntsfield. This attractive and generously proportioned property on the first floor of a traditional Victorian tenement features charming period features including ornate cornicing ...
"Delightful modernised flat, forming part of beautiful Pilrig House, a Grade A listed 17th century turreted Laird’s House of great historical and literary significance, ..."
"NEW FIXED PRICE - Recently updated to give a bright, modern feeling, this lovely two bedroom period flat is set on the first floor of a handsome period terrace overlooking the ..."
Well-Presented First Floor Flat - 3 Spacious Double Bedrooms - Sitting Room - Kitchen/Dining Room - Box Room/Study - Bathroom - Utility Room - Traditional Features - Excellent School Catchments 
"Spacious ground floor apartment offers stylish open plan living, kitchen, dining area with private terrace, family bathroom and principal en suite."
"The Bunting is an impressive apartment featuring TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS and a THIRD FLEXIBLE, SINGLE BEDROOM. The kitchen/lounge/dining area is OPEN-PLAN, perfect for entertaining, with plenty of NATURAL LIGHT. The main bedroom benefits from an en suite shower room and there is also a family bathroo..."
"An appealing detached villa with driveway, garage with power and lighting and well maintained private gardens, forming part of a mature, well established modern development.This ..."
A well-presented and ideally located two bedroom first floor flat in the popular Comely Bank area. The immediate locality is well served by a host of amenities and there is easy access to Stockbridge and the city centre. The property is accessed via a secure entry-phone system into a well-maintai...
"WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS – IT’S ENTIRELY YOUR CHOICE. WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £17,049, PLUS WE’LL INCLUDE FLOORING OR WARDROBES. The Huntly is designed as a comfortable family home. The front-aspect lounge is a spacious hub and connects to the brigh..."
"NOW UNDER OFFER - Enjoying a quiet cul de sac position away from the main road in the city’s exclusive Grange area, sits this unique end-terrace house. With the additional bonus of PRIVATE PARKING AND GARAGE"
"Blair Cadell are delighted to bring to market this unique two bed detached house in the heart of Slateford. With superb links to the city centre and fantastic local amenities, the ..."
Last remaining top floor apartment with West facing balcony. Full LBTT & flooring included. Style E2 is a fabulous two-bedroom apartment with a superb open plan concept.
"** NEW FIXED PRICE (£20k BELOW HR VALUATION ** Picturesque 2-bedroom Victorian cottage tucked away on a peaceful leafy lane in the sought-after area of Colinton. With immediate access to the wonderful walks of Colinton Dell, Water of Leith walkway and the entrance to the Pentlan..."
"Luxurious one bedroom apartment at Waverley Square. Ready to move into. Contact us to book your private Rettie & Co. viewing appointment, or attend the open viewings on Thursdays from 3-7pm and Sundays from 12-4pm. Set in the heart of Edinburgh’s historic Old Town..."
"Set on a quiet, tree lined street, moments from the Meadows is this immaculately presented first floor apartment. Offered to the market in true move-in condition having been  ..."
"The Bunting is an impressive apartment featuring TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS and a THIRD FLEXIBLE, SINGLE BEDROOM. The kitchen/lounge/dining area is OPEN-PLAN, perfect for entertaining, with plenty of natural light. The main bedroom benefits from an EN SUITE SHOWER ROOM and there is also a family bathroo..."
"The Bunting is an impressive apartment featuring TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS and a third FLEXIBLE, SINGLE BEDROOM. The kitchen/lounge/dining area is open-plan, perfect for entertaining, with PLENTY OF NATURAL LIGHT. The main bedroom benefits from an EN SUITE SHOWER ROOM and there is also a family bathroo..."
"*** £10K UNDER HOME REPORT *** Commanding spectacular views of Salisbury Crags in Holyrood Park, the well-presented two-bedroom apartment forms part of a beautifully designed modern residential development that is set around an inner courtyard garden. Situated on the first ..."
"An excellent opportunity has arisen to purchase this spacious and bright third/top floor flat forming part of a traditional tenement block, conveniently located in the heart of ..."
"Immaculately presented and spacious, two-bedroom, second (top) floor flat, forming part of an impressive converted townhouse. Located on a leafy side street, in Edinburgh's highly sought-after Morningside area, just south of the city centre. The reception hall gives access throughout, includin..."
Stylish 3 bed top floor flat for sale in West End
A spectacular two-bedroom traditional first floor apartment in desirable leafy Merchiston area of Edinburgh
"Blair Cadell are delighted to bring to market this immaculate two bed house in the heart of Corstorphine. With finishes throughout to the highest standard, the property is in ..."
"Quietly situated in the much sought-after residential area of Corstorphine, this subject of sale forms an attractive semi-detached 2 bedroom bungalow with converted attic, ..."
"Beautifully presented, factor-maintained three-bedroom, two-bathroom apartment occupying a first floor position within an attractive red sandstone Victorian building in the Liberton area. Sympathetically converted by prestigious developers Square and Crescent to create unique contemporary apartm..."
An elegant double upper apartment forming part of a unique Gothic style ‘C’ Listed building built circa 1873 with beautiful architectural features. The property is located within one of the City’s most sought after residential areas in a quiet street and is close to an excellent...
Show home now open. Style E2 is a fabulous two-bedroom apartment with a superb open plan concept.
"This four bedroom DETACHED HOME has a spacious FRONT LOUNGE which connects to an OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN/DINING AREA leading out to the BACK GARDEN. The UTILITY ROOM and WC can be found just off the kitchen. Upstairs features THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS, with bedroom 1 offering an EN SUITE; a SINGLE BEDROOM ..."
"The Rosevale is an impressive apartment featuring two double bedrooms and a third flexible, single bedroom. The kitchen/lounge/dining area is open-plan, perfect for entertaining, with plenty of natural light. The main bedroom benefits from an en suite shower room and the apartment offers a storag..."
FIXED PRICE - NO BIDDING WARS. UP TO 5% DEPOSIT INCENTIVE AVAILABLE. Luxurious APARTMENT in an excellent CITY LOCATION. DESIGNER KITCHEN & BATHROOMS. Spacious OPEN PLAN LIVING. Optional UNDERGROUND PARKING. 
"A superb top floor flat with views of Edinburgh Castle in highly desirable Bruntsfield, close to excellent amenities and transport links.This generously proportioned top floor ..."
"Impressive 3rd floor apartment with 2 double bedrooms forming part of a prestigious Georgian A listed terrace, enjoying a quiet yet very convenient central location in the ..."
"Formerly a historic innkeeper’s house, this is a unique stone-built three-bedroom semi-detached property located in a quiet area in Edinburgh’s popular Corstorphine. Set over three floors it boasts flexible family accommodation with a large garden and original stable offering potential for conver..."
"Closing Date set Wednesday 5th April at 11am.A unique opportunity has arisen to acquire this stunning, three-bedroom townhouse forming part of a prestigious modern development. ..."
"*NEW TO MARKET* Commanding magnificent views of Salisbury Crags in Holyrood Park, this well-presented two-bedroom apartment forms part of a beautifully designed modern residential development in the heart of Holyrood. Situated on the fourth floor of the prestigious development, this li..."
"Attractive and well-presented detached villa, set in a quiet cul-de-sac location in the much sought after East Clapperfield residential estate in Liberton."
Quietly positioned three bedroom detached house situated in a well established modern development within the popular residential area of Liberton in the south of Edinburgh. The ...
"Set on a quiet street in the heart of Comely Bank, moments from some of the city’s finest artisan shops, restaurants, cafes and bars is this spacious first floor apartment. ..."
Spacious Family Home - 5 Bedrooms - 2 Bathrooms (1 En Suite) - Large Sitting Room - Kitchen/Dining Room - Private Rear Garden - Allocated Parking 
"Set on a quiet street, moments from excellent amenities, quick transport links and vast open green spaces is this immaculately presented and stylishly decorated detached family ..."
"Magnificent two bed dual-facing top floor apartment of immense appeal benefiting from carefully considered interior specification, which features thoughtful design elements and ..."
"An immaculately presented first floor flat, quietly tucked away in the popular Viewforth."
"5 Joppa Park is a rarely available traditional Lower Villa Flat with Two Double Bedrooms, situated in a prime position, a one-minute walk from Portobello beach and esplanade.  An impressive property offering a truly idyllic setting with the stunning sandy beach and sea views on the doorstep,..."
"Light and beautifully presented, two-bedroom, mid-terrace double upper villa, with a private garden, part of a modern 'colonies-style' residential development. Conveniently situated in the vibrant and sought-after Bellevue area, just north of Edinburgh city centre. A welcoming entrance hall, w..."
"The Thurso is a four-bedroom detached family home. It features a lounge, separate dining room or playroom/office, open-plan kitchen/dining area with direct rear garden access, downstairs cloakroom, large first-floor landing with a window providing light, an en suite bedroom and a family bathroom."
"WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR HELP WITH YOUR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS - YOU CHOOSE! WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £17,999 PLUS WE'LL INCLUDE FLOORING. 
This four bedroom DETACHED HOME has a spacious FRONT LOUNGE which connects to an OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN/DINING AREA leading out to the BACK..."
"The Erinvale is an attractive, 3-bedroom family home which features an open-plan kitchen/dining area with French doors to the rear garden, along with separate living room. Upstairs, the double master bedroom features an en suite and a Juliet balcony, whilst the remaining share a family bathroom"
"FULL MARKET VALUE PART EXCHANGE AVAILABLE. OR, WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS – IT’S ENTIRELY YOUR CHOICE. WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £17,899, PLUS WE’LL INCLUDE FLOORING. 
The Hume is designed as a COMFORTABLE FAMILY HOME. The ground floor features a GENEROU..."
"The Lytham is a chain free, energy efficient home which presents a contemporary, open-plan kitchen and dining area with French doors to the rear garden plus a modern bathroom. Upstairs features three spacious double bedrooms, with an en suite to bedroom 1 and a modern family bathroom for the others"
"Set within a handsome terrace, in the bustling heart of the cosmopolitan area of Stockbridge, this beautiful two bedroom, ground floor flat offers smart living space with ..."
"Immaculately presented first floor apartment with 2 double bedrooms and open aspect to the front, forming part of a prestigious traditional stone-built townhouse conversion, in ..."
"This extended semi-detached bungalow with private gardens, long driveway and garage is situated within the highly sought after residential area of Corstorphine, close to excellent ..."
"This attractive semi detached villa forms part of a popular and established residential development, enjoying a peaceful setting near the foot of Corstorphine Hill, in ..."
"The Huntly is designed as a comfortable family home. The front-aspect lounge is a spacious hub and connects to the bright kitchen/dining room, which opens onto the back garden. A functional lobby with utility space and WC is located just off the kitchen. Upstairs are two generous double bedrooms ..."
"The Balerno is a beautifully proportioned four-bedroom home with an internal garage and a large kitchen and utility area with outside access. The lounge has French doors that lead out to the garden and there's a spacious front-aspect dining room. Upstairs, bedroom one benefits from a large en suite."
"The Lismore is a four-bedroom detached home with a single integral garage. It features an under-stairs cupboard, lounge, kitchen/dining room with French doors leading to the garden, utility room and cloakroom. Upstairs there's a storage cupboard, bedroom one with an en suite, and a family bathroom."
"A bright and spacious second floor flat situated in an exclusive modern development, set within immaculately maintained landscaped communal gardens, located in the prestigious area of Merchiston. This superb south facing property offers a beautiful home which enjoys a lovely open outlook and bene..."
"Exciting opportunity to purchase this commercial unit, drive & additional yard with approved building warrant in place to create a three bedroom detached home in one of the most sought after districts in Edinburgh"
"An excellent opportunity has arisen to acquire this rarely available three bedroom semi-detached family home, situated on a much sought after street in Liberton. Boasting ..."
"Recently reduced - Nestled on a charming, tranquil street in the heart of Joppa is this well-presented Victorian main door maisonette set over three levels with driveway and ..."
3 Bedroom Terraced House - Desirable Location - 3 Double Bedrooms - Large Private Rear Garden - Kitchen/Dining Room - Bright Sitting Room - Shower Room - Single Garage - Allocated Parking Space 
An excellent opportunity has arisen to acquire this rarely available two bedroom detached bungalow situated within a sought after pocket of Kingsknowe. With extension opportunity ...
Incredibly rare opportunity to purchase a generous building plot
"Part exchange available! McEwan Fraser is delighted to present this two-bedroom mid-terraced house to the market. The property sits in a quiet cul-de-sac in sought-after Morningside and is in the catchment for Boroughmuir High School. Internally, the property is presented in very good order and t..."
A well-presented semi-detached villa situated within the highly desirable Corstorphine district of the city a short journey to the west of Edinburgh Centre.  The property ...
" 13 3F1 Broughton Place is a nice top floor flat forming part of a Georgian tenement in the extremely desirable New Town district of Edinburgh. With access to excellent local amenities and right in the city centre, this is a fantastic flat in a great location.   Welcoming hall; generously proport..."
"Excellent terraced family home in high amenity area. The versatile accommodation is arranged over three levels and comprises; at garden level; sitting room, dining/family room, kitchen, bathroom with white three piece suite having a hand shower over the bath. Ground floor comprises; two double be..."
Vacant commercial building with full planning permission to convert to 3 bedroom residential bungalow.
"Impressive two bedroom apartment in the Trinity area forming the ground and lower ground levels of an elegant original sandstone Victorian building with commanding seascape views across the Firth of Forth to Fife, immediate proximity to Granton Harbour and only 1.5 miles to the city centre. Close..."
This super property enjoys enviable far-reaching views over the Firth of Forth and the East Lothian coastline. Situated on the ground floor with direct access to a large private ...
Luxurious studio apartment at New Eidyn. Apt 15 is a beautifully crafted studio apartment finished to the highest standard with an impressive specification. This stunning studio apartment offers a beautiful open plan space above the hustle and bustle of Edinburgh’s streets. Resid...
"Nestled in a cobbled street just moments from Stockbridge’s fashionable Raeburn Place, this is a well-presented fully refurbished two-bedroom apartment. On the first floor of a Category B-listed classical Edinburgh tenement built in 1813, each room is beautifully proportioned, bright, and finishe..."
"A wonderful three-bedroom end-terraced townhouse set over three floors in the sought-after district of Liberton. Forming part of an exclusive development by David Wilson Homes, this superb property is an ideal family home. Boasting spacious accommodation throughout, modern finishes and offered to..."
"Offering stylish city accommodation in the desirable Trinity district, just a stone’s throw from the water and within the Newhaven conservation area, 9/2 Craighall Road is a ..."
"Neilsons are delighted to present to the market this well-proportioned three bedroom semi-detached villa, situated in a quiet pocket of the much sought after district of ..."
"High spec apartment with a private terrace, reserve Plot 241 for 'Just The One' fee of £250*."
" Excellent Flat in a Sought After Location!!Carol Lawton and RE/MAX Property are delighted to offer to the market this superb 1st floor flat which is situated within a traditional tenement in the highly regarded area of Morningside. Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, box room/office area, dini..."
"Part exchange available! McEwan Fraser is delighted to present this superbly presented, three-bedroom, first-floor flat to the market. The property forms part of a traditional tenement building in the popular Tollcross area, close to Edinburgh city centre."
"Wonderful two bedroom, third floor apartment featuring a wardrobe and ensuite to bedroom one. This luxury two bedroomapartment is perfect for those looking to move to an energy-efficient, low-maintenance home close to Edinburgh city centre. The Kirkwall features an open-plan lounge-dining-kit..."
"This Category B-listed, three-bedroom apartment is found on a picturesque, cobbled street just off Stockbridge’s Raeburn Place. Now in need of modernisation, it will make a wonderful blank canvas for anyone looking to start their property journey or as an investment opportunity in the centr..."
"Truly outstanding, significantly upgraded detached bungalow with private gardens and garage, located within a pleasant residential street, close to excellent amenities and road ..."
"A fantastic opportunity has arisen to purchase this generously proportioned mid-terraced with private gardens, situated within the highly desirable area of Portobello, and within ..."
"£20,000 UNDER HOME REPORT VALUATION! This exceptionally spacious, well presented basement flat with private patio to front is set within a traditional Edinburgh tenement, ..."
"This well-presented two-bedroom property lies in the heart of Edinburgh’s historic Dean Village. On the third floor of a popular contemporary development, it is spacious with an appealing neutral décor filled with light. Enviably located it is within walking distance of the vibrant W..."
"Located on a quiet street, moments from vast open green spaces of Holyrood Park is this rarely available 1950’s three bed semi-detached villa of immense appeal set within ..."
Stunning contemporary apartment forming part of the iconic Playfair Building at Donaldson's
"1/3 Craufurdland is a beautifully presented, spacious ground floor three bedroom apartment forming part of a prestigious development in the much sought after location of ..."
"Umega are proud to offer for sale this fantastic two-bedroom apartment at Rowanbank Gardens, Gylemuir Road, Corstorphine brought to you by award-winning Artisan Real Estate. "
"This stylish three bedroom home is PERFECT FOR A FAMILY. On the ground floor, there is a KITCHEN/DINING ROOM with access to the garden, while on the opposite side of the home, you will find the LOUNGE which features two windows allowing for a light and airy room. You will also find a WC AND STORA..."
"The Glencoe is an energy efficient, chain free home with benefits from a large kitchen including selected integrated appliances and French doors to rear garden. There is also a large living room and integral garage. Upstairs there are 2 double bedrooms and 1 single, with an en suite to bedroom 1."
"This spacious three bedroom semi-detached home is great for those looking to take the next step on the property ladder. Downstairs you have a comfortable living room to the front and at the back of the home, you'll find a spacious kitchen/dining/family room leading to the back garden. A utility r..."
"This four-bedroom detached family home provides flexible living space. It features a lounge to the front with a triple window, open-plan kitchen/dining area with access to the garden and downstairs WC. There’s a large landing with a window, bedroom one has an en suite and there’s a family bathroom."
"A three-bedroom double upper situated just off Portobello High Street. The property is well-presented throughout and retains many original features including four panel oak doors, and intricate cornicing. It has an abundance of natural light, and the layout is thoughtfully considered to provide c..."
"Sitting on Ardmillan Terrace, where Gorgie and Dalry meet. Plot 18 is ideally positioned to take advantage of all these areas have to offer. This newly built ground floor flat lies within AMA’s Springwell development and has been designed with your practicality and comfort in mind. Internally t..."
Part Exchange and flooring included on Plot 75 - a unique Capital Duplex Home featuring a south facing terrace plus a flexible playroom/home office. 
A rare opportunity has arisen to acquire this substantial four bedroom seventh floor apartment situated in a modern harbour-front residential development in Granton. With ...
"Neilsons are delighted to offer on to the market this appealing first floor flat with secure allocated parking space, forming part of an exclusive development, located in the ..."
"An immaculately presented, recently refurbished, three bedroom, first-floor flat in the sought after Trinity area of Edinburgh, lying north of the city centre."
An excellent opportunity has arisen to acquire this fantastic and rarely available one bedroom top floor flat with box room. Situated in a sought-after pocket of Bellevue close to ...
"This bright and generously proportioned apartment is located on the second floor of a beautifully kept purpose built block, bordered by delightful mature gardens in the ..."
Rarely available elevated ground floor flat with large private terrace in an exclusive modern development with underground parking and lift access. Spacious accommodation with two ...
"The Dunlop is a 4 bedroom modern living home over 3 storeys, ideally situated to growing families or professional couples"
"Neilsons are delighted to offer on to the market this exceptionally charming second/top floor flat, which forms part of a traditional Victorian terrace, enjoying a superb location ..."
"Designed with modern living in mind, these stylish two-bedroom ground floor open-plan apartments have everything to offer."
"This generously proportioned second floor flat forms part of an attractive gated conversion, enjoying a superb location on a peaceful residential street, located in the capitals ..."
"Situated in the heart of Edinburgh's Old Town, a World Heritage Site and Conservation area, this charming second floor flat (Listed Category B) forms part of a traditional Victorian tenement (circa1871) located just off the Royal Mile and close to excellent amenities. The flat is ideally placed t..."
A top floor duplex flat part of a traditional building situated within the vibrant Shore district of the city a short journey to the north-east of Edinburgh City Centre.  There ...
"**New Fixed Price** Enjoying stunning views of Arthur's Seat and Salisbury Crags, 24 (2F) Marchhall Crescent is a charming apartment which occupies the entire top floor of a converted Victorian terrace house, situated on a leafy residential street."
"Situated on Hopetoun Street, in the much-favoured Bellevue district of Central Edinburgh this immaculately presented two-bedroom lift served first floor apartment ideal for first / second time movers or for those looking to downsize."
"Contemporary two bedroom, third floor apartment with the choice of £3,000 towards LBTT or flooring throughout* The Bowmore is a fabulous two bedroom, third floor apartment and perfect for those looking to move to an energy-efficient, low-maintenance home. This wonderful apartment featur..."
"The Rosefinch is a spacious two bedroom apartment and with FANTASTIC STORAGE SPACE THROUGHOUT. The kitchen/dining/lounge area is open-plan, perfect for FLEXIBLE LIVING so you can design your home to suit your lifestyle. FRENCH DOORS lead to an external TERRACE and let in plenty of NATURAL LIGHT. ..."
"The downstairs features a bright and airy open-plan kitchen/dining room with a built in breakfast bar and access to the rear garden. You will also find a utility room, WC, and lounge area. Upstairs, you have two double bedrooms and an additional single bedroom with bedroom 1 benefiting from an en..."
"Most appealing traditional first floor flat offering a lovely mix of period style features and modern fittings, boasting a south-west facing outlook in a highly regarded area ..."
"A beautifully presented two-bedroom traditional apartment located on the third floor of a handsome tenement building in the heart of cosmopolitan Stockbridge. Spacious and stylish interiors marked by high-quality contemporary finishes, 67/6 Raeburn Place is a desirable property located..."
Bright and Spacious Third Floor Apartment - Lift Access - Southernly Aspect and Castle Views - 2 Double Bedrooms - 2 Bathrooms (1En Suite) - Sitting Room - Kitchen - Residents' Parking - Excellent Storage
"A rare opportunity has arisen to acquire an exceptional detached villa benefiting from carefully considered interior specification, which features thoughtful design elements and ..."
"Set in a modern, manicured, luxury development surrounded by excellent amenities, quick transport links and vast open green and coastal walks is this immaculately presented second ..."
"With stylish open-plan living and a spacious terrace, reserve Plot 251 for 'Just The One' fee of £250*."
"Bright and spacious two-bedroom lower ground floor flat located in a modern development on St Stephen Street, a much sought-after location in Edinburgh’s Historic New Town. The property boasts a spacious sitting room with direct access onto a private paved terrace, dining kitchen, spacious ..."
"Enjoying a central location in sought-after Bellevue, this large third/top-floor flat is an ideal city residence for professionals, couples, and first-time buyers. The home is ..."
"This spacious ground floor flat with private south-west facing garden lies in a highly sought-after location in Leith Links in east Edinburgh, close to popular bars, restaurants and cafes at the Shore and within easy reach of the city centre. The property has been recently refurbished to a high s..."
"Beautifully presented first floor apartment with 2 double bedrooms forming part of a traditional building, situated in the sought-after area of Morningside close to excellent ..."
"Boyd Property are delighted to market this charming top floor flat, forming part of a traditional stone-built tenement building, situated in the much sought after Morningside area ..."
"FIXED AT HOME REPORT VALUE Located within the highly sought after Stockbridge district of Edinburgh, St Stephen Street is a lovely street comprises traditional tenement buildings with an array of independent shops and bistros. We offer for sale this most attractive, bright and spaciou..."
"Located in the highly sought after residential area of Comely Bank, this superb 1 bedroom third floor flat forms part of a traditional tenement building. The property lies with ..."
"£5,000 BELOW HOME REPORT VALUATION! A delightful detached bungalow with driveway, garage and enclosed private garden, which enjoys lovely outlook towards the Pentland Hills and is situated in quiet street in established residential area. The property provides well proportioned accomm..."
"This light and spacious, three-bedroom apartment forms part of the luxurious Platinum Point waterfront development in Newhaven, benefitting from panoramic views over the Firth of Forth to Berwick Law. Located on the sixth floor and presented to the market in immaculate condition, this well-propor..."
"The Rosefinch is a spacious TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT AND WITH FANTASTIC STORAGE SPACE throughout. The kitchen/dining/lounge area is OPEN-PLAN, perfect for FLEXIBLE LIVING so you can design your home to suit your lifestyle. FRENCH DOORS LEAD TO AN EXTERNAL TERRACE and let in plenty of natural light. ..."
"The Rosefinch is a spacious TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT and with fantastic STORAGE SPACE throughout. The kitchen/dining/lounge area is OPEN-PLAN, perfect for FLEXIBLE LIVING so you can design your home to suit your lifestyle. FRENCH DOORS lead to an EXTERNAL TERRACE and let in plenty of natural light. ..."
"Spacious and beautifully presented, two-bedroom, detached bungalow, with a garage and private gardens. Set in a quiet residential cul-de-sac with views of the Pentland Hills, located in the sought-after Swanston area, to the south of Edinburgh city centre. The entrance hall has carpeted f..."
"Situated in sought-after Comely Bank, this two-bedroom, third-floor flat enjoys a desirable setting in the capital, positioned within easy reach of amenities, schooling, transport links and fashionable Stockbridge. The home features spacious rooms which are finished in light neutral tones, all..."
20/1 East Suffolk Park is a spaciously presented ground floor two bedroom apartment which forms part of an historic “B” listed development quietly situated in the much ...
"Plot B1.03  is an impressive, low carbon, 2-bedroom 1st floor apartment within the groundbreaking Rowanbank Gardens development brought to you by award-winning Artisan Real Estate. MARKETING SUITE NOW OPEN"
Enjoying a wealth of original features along with bright and spacious rooms is this beautifully presented lower apartment. The property forms part of a traditional Victorian villa which has been converted into apartments sharing an entrance vestibule with stained glass arch window. There is gas...
"This Traditional Property Lies Just A Stones Throw From The Meadows, with traditional features overlooking the tree lined street. "
"Neilsons are delighted to offer on to the market this appealing first floor flat which forms part of an elegant period terrace, located in the heart of Edinburgh’s ..."
"COMING SOON PLEASE REGISTER FOR LAUNCH INFORMATION Only 4 stunning two bedroom apartments. High specification and situated within the heart of Corstorphine village, close to Kirk Loan and the High Street. Contemporary open plan layouts. Must be viewed."
"Quirky HMO ground floor property, great for an investment."
Spanning two floors this spacious and bright detached three-bedroom property is quietly located in a popular residential area approximately four miles from Edinburgh city centre. 
"Set on the first floor of a traditional building in Morningside, within the Plewlands conservation area, this well-proportioned flat comes with two double bedrooms, a spacious ..."
"An attractive two bedroom, ground floor flat with private gardens."
"This spacious apartment features TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS, the main bedroom complete with an EN SUITE SHOWER ROOM. In the open-plan living space, you will find an L-shaped kitchen with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES, space for a dining area and a lounge. Built-in cupboards in the hallway provide USEFUL UTILITY..."
"This second-floor flat forms part of a contemporary development in desirable Leith and boasts immaculate interiors, a sociable open-plan living area, three bedrooms, an en-suite shower room, and a bathroom, and private, allocated parking space. The flat benefits from enviable close proximity to m..."
"OPEN VIEWINGS An immaculate three-bedroom first floor apartment in a desirable, contemporary and factored development, built by Cala, in the sought after Roseburn district of Edinburgh"
"The Leith is a superb four-bedroom detached family home. There's a spacious utility room, downstairs cloakroom, en suite master bedroom and a single garage. The large kitchen/dining area lends itself to family meals as well as entertaining friends, with french doors opening onto the rear garden."
This rarely available bright and spacious period flat is located within a small well-kept stair comprising only four flats and enjoys an enviable position within the established ...
"Situated on the second floor of a luxury waterside development, this three-bedroom, two-bathroom apartment promises impressive views across Newhaven harbour and the city skyline ..."
"A bright and spacious first floor flat which enjoys a lovely leafy outlook, situated in a modern development located in the highly regarded area of Barnton. This superb property offers a beautiful home which benefits from a lift, residents parking and a well maintained landscaped communal garden..."
"Immaculately presented and spacious, four-bedroom, semi-detached house, with gardens and a driveway. Located in the popular Clermiston area, northwest of the City Centre. A welcoming entrance hall has wood effect flooring extending throughout the majority of the ground floor, stairs leading to..."
"Outstanding 3 bedroom first floor city centre flat in excellent move-in condition. Next to the new tram line, just a few hundred metres from St. James Quarter. Flexible third bedroom / home office. EPC rated C with sash double glazing and Council Tax Band C. Call Dunpark for a viewing."
"This spacious apartment features TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS, the main bedroom complete with an EN SUITE SHOWER ROOM. In the OPEN-PLAN LIVING SPACE, you will find an L-shaped kitchen with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES, space for a dining area and a lounge. BUILT-IN CUPBOARDS in the hallway provide useful utility..."
"Presented in good condition this large one-bedroom apartment with a shared rear garden occupies a popular Stockbridge location, moments from Raeburn Place. It benefits from an abundance of natural light, delightful rooftop views, and fine period details. Generously proportioned it offers potentia..."
Beautifully presented two bedroom second floor tenement flat located in the extremely popular Polwarth area of Edinburgh. This flat will appeal to a wide variety of buyers and is entered via shared hallway which also gives access out to the shared residents garden to the rear of the block. ...
A beautifully presented two-bedroom first floor apartment in the prestigious Colinton area of Edinburgh. Finished to a high standard and forming part of an exclusive development.
"Closing Date Thursday 6th April at 12noon.Rarely available 3 bedroom penthouse flat with large west facing sun terrace, commanding a prime position on the much respected Strada ..."
"Set in a quiet cul-de-sac, moments from the Water of Leith, excellent amenities and quick transport links is this immaculately presented terraced house. Boasting private front and ..."
Well-Presented Two Bedroom Apartment - 2 Bathrooms - Open Plan Living/ Dining Room - Private Parking - Private Balcony - Central Location - Factored Development 
"Tastefully presented, one-bedroom, second-floor flat, forming part of an impressive traditional stone-built tenement. Located in Edinburgh's highly sought-after Bruntsfield area, just south of the city centre. A welcoming entrance hall, with generous storage, showcases the richly-toned hardwoo..."
"A superb two-bedroom first floor flat within a modern factored development in the popular Dean Village. The property, which is presented in move-in condition provides spacious accommodation comprising, entrance hall with storage cupboard, a utility cupboard, large sitting dining room with window ..."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase a first floor, one bedroom flat in a traditional Georgian building in the heart of New Town."
Exceptional third floor apartment forming part of a sought-after factored modern development in the most popular Fettes area. Close to an excellent range of amenities and ...
"9 Joppa Terrace is a stunning, 2 bedroom main door villa, situated on a quiet residential street in the highly desirable area of Joppa, a short walk from the Promenade and ..."
"Set on a quiet street, moments from excellent amenities and quick transport links is this immaculately presented detached family home. Boasting private front and rear gardens, a ..."
"This spacious and impressive traditional second floor flat, is situated within the heart of Morningside close to a host of excellent amenities and transport links. The property ..."
"The Dunblane features a stunning open-plan kitchen/diner with French doors opening into the garden and a separate lounge. There’s also a WC and two storage cupboards. Upstairs there are three bedrooms, including a large bedroom one with en suite, a family-sized bathroom and handy storage cupboard."
"20 Badger Way is an immaculately presented End Terraced Townhouse offering Four Bedrooms, private gardens and a private driveway, set within a popular modern residential development close to Liberton, with excellent local amenities in the vicinity and offering easy access to the City Centre and C..."
Now selling at a Fixed Price.  McDougall McQueen present to the market this fabulous and rarely available one bedroom top floor flat forming part of a handsome Georgian building with access to the private roof garden from the attic room. The property is ideally located the heart of Edinburgh...
"The two bedroom VERMONT boasts an OPEN DESIGN in the living room, with INTEGRATED STAIRCASE. There's a useful cupboard as well as a built-in wardrobe in the PRINCIPAL BEDROOM. The second bedroom could also become a useful home office."
**UNDER HOME REPORT VALUE** RARELY AVAILABLE 2 BED MODERN FLAT IN POPULAR DEVELOPMENT WALK IN CONDITION AND ALLOCATED PARKING SPACE. GCH & DG. 
"This is a beautiful newly constructed, spacious (646 Sqft) main door, one-bed apartment with level access and set within a communal yet private garden with secured allocated car parking space within the Springwell development. Springwell is an imposing presence, sitting in beautifully landscaped..."
"Enjoying spectacular views of the Pentland Hills, this stunning townhouse is situated in a modern development in the residential district of Longstone, in the South-West of Edinburgh. Longstone offers a variety of local shops, amenities, local schools and is ideally placed for Edinburgh College a..."
"This bright, main door, ground floor flat in sought after Craigleith, is presented to an exacting standard throughout and offers flexible accommodation with the benefit of a garden and lock-up garage."
PLOT 42 AT SPRINGWELL HOUSE IS A LOVELY AND BRIGHT ONE BEDROOM APARTMENT ON THE SECOND FLOOR WITH A PRIVATE CAR PARKING SPACE. SPRINGWELL WILL BE AMA’S NEWEST EDINBURGH RESIDENTIAL DEVELOPMENT.
Neilsons are delighted to present to market this rarely available three bedroom end-terraced home superbly positioned within a much sought-after modern development in Liberton. ...
"WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS – IT’S ENTIRELY YOUR CHOICE. WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £15,199, PLUS WE’LL INCLUDE FLOORING OR WARDROBES. OR, IF YOU'VE GOT A HOME TO SELL WE COULD BE YOUR GUARANTEED BUYER WITH PART EXCHANGE.
This top floor apartment offers a ..."
"Blair Cadell are delighted to bring to market this immaculate three bed main door flat with superb links to the city centre. In turn key condition, the property would be ideal for ..."
**Video Tour Available** A bright and spacious 2-bedroom flat set in the heart of the city centre. Entered on the first floor from a communal stair the property boasts a spacious open plan Kitchen/living room. Two spacious double bedrooms and separate WC and shower room. The...
Part Exchange available! McEwan Fraser is delighted to present this three-bedroom top-floor apartment to the market. The property forms part of a small and highly regarded modern development and is present to the market in 'walk-in' condition.
"6 Marischal Place is a most attractive Upper Villa offering Two Double Bedrooms, with a private entrance, a large private south facing roof terrace and rear garden, located in the popular residential area of Blackhall, lying two and a half miles north west of Edinburgh city centre and close to ex..."
"1/3 Dunbar's Close is a well-presented two-bedroom first floor flat with stunning views towards Calton Hill, situated on the Royal Mile within the historic Old Town. The location is superb with excellent local amenities and is a convenient distance from the city centre & surrounding areas. ..."
Fantastic opportunity to purchase a top floor penthouse apartment located in an established modern development in the extremely popular Abbeyhill area of Edinburgh. The flat will appeal to a variety of buyers from young couples and families to professionals being so close to the city centre as we...
"Beautifully presented and spacious, four-bedroom, three-storey, semi-detached family home, with gardens and a driveway. Set in a modern, factored residential development in The Wisp area, south of Edinburgh city centre. A light and welcoming hall gives access throughout the ground floor a..."
"FIXED PRICE £15,000 UNDER HOME REPORT.  Set on a quiet, tree-lined street in the heart of Marchmont, moments from The Meadows, excellent amenities and the university ..."
20/3 Comely Bank Street is a well-presented flat forming part of a traditional tenement building in the popular and attractive residential district of Comely Bank. The spacious first-floor flat benefits from traditional features such as fireplaces and cornicing and is conveniently located for a h...
"Enjoying a highly-desirable city centre address with far-reaching leafy views, this two-bedroom second-floor flat lies within a modern development, offering secure private parking and situated within walking distance of Princes Street and Stockbridge’s delightful shopping area. The bright, south-..."
"Enjoy a desirable Stockbridge location with this ground-floor apartment just off Raeburn Place. Tastefully renovated throughout, the result is a fresh yet relaxed modern design with impeccably finished and light-filled interiors. An enviable position boasting exceptional amenities on the doorstep..."
"Located within the sought after Marchmont conservation area of Edinburgh with the green expanses of The Meadows at the end of the street is this lovely second floor flat. Enjoying many original features, the flat enjoys lovely ceiling cornicing and rose along with pitched wood doors. "
"This impressive, well presented penthouse apartment on the 6th floor forms part of the desirable modern Britannia Quay development with allocated parking space within the secure ..."
"Set on a quiet street in the heart of Newington, moments from excellent local eateries, quick transport links and vast open green spaces is this well presented second floor ..."
Situated in the highly popular Urban Eden development is this most impressive duplex with great views to Arthur seat. With gas central heating and full double glazing the property offers bright and spacious contemporary living with specious terrace. The accommodation includes an entrance hallw...
"Immaculately presented and spacious, one-bedroom, dual-aspect, first-floor apartment with a private patio terrace. Set in a modern, factored, exclusive residential development, located in the highly desirable Canonmills area, just north of Edinburgh city centre. The hallway gives access throug..."
A main door flat situated within the vibrant Polwarth district of the city perfectly positioned for access into Edinburgh City Centre and close to a wide range of local ...
"Charming two-bedroom ground floor apartment set in a traditional tenement building in a quiet cul-de-sac, superbly situated in a high amenity area convenient for the central ..."
"Set on a quiet, tree-lined cul-de-sac, moments from Portobello beach and Brunstane train station is this immaculately presented townhouse. Boasting a private rear garden, wide ..."
"This charming and unique double upper property has four double bedrooms, a main door entrance and private parking. Offering spacious and flexible accommodation over two floors ..."
"Beautifully presented second floor flat situated within a modern development in the popular Bellevue area on the fringe of the Historic New Town; and within a short walk of the City Centre. The property benefits from private off street parking, gas central heating and double glazing. Outline plan..."
"Situated by Arthur’s Seat, this modern, two-bedroom, first-floor apartment has a highly desirable position in Edinburgh’s much soughtafter Old Town, set within easy reach of all the city centre has to offer. The home is presented with attractive neutral interiors and quality fixtures ..."
Located in an exclusive residential development in Edinburgh’s Newhaven district is this luxury 2 bedroom apartment
"Well presented, light and spacious first floor flat, forming part of a traditional tenement and located within one of the city's most desirable residential areas. This lovely ..."
"A fantastic well presented one bedroom property situated in the iconic Playfair Donaldson's development, offering a private secure parking space"
Neilsons are delighted to present to market this fantastic two bedroom semi-detached house situated in a quiet residential pocket of the sought after district of Corstorphine. ...
"Fixed price £5,000 under the Home Report valuation. Set in a handsome tenement within easy reach of the city centre is this spacious third floor apartment currently ..."
‘Extended 5-bedroomed terraced house on mature estate opposite Western General Hospital'
"14/4 Canaan Lane is a well-presented, two-bedroom terraced apartment situated in the heart of the sought-after Morningside Conservation Area. Occupying the first floor, this property is a generously-proportioned apartment offering spacious and comfortable accommodation, ideal for moder..."
"Offering bright and spacious accommodation, including four bedrooms, a generous living room, a dining kitchen, and two bathrooms, this semi-detached house is tucked in a quiet cul- de-sac in Duddingston (near Fort Kinnaird) and is accompanied by front and rear gardens and unrestricted on-street p..."
"A 1 bedroom newly developed, luxurious apartment in the heart of Edinburgh. The apartment situated at York Place form part of a charming B listed building, located right in the heart of Edinburgh. The building has undergone an extensive refurbishment by developers, Allanton Capital, resulting in..."
"With 3 bedrooms and a sociable lounge diner, the semi-detached Bryce is perfect if you're looking for a little extra space."
Delightful one-bedroom property in the popular Quatermile Development with an allocated parking space.  
"Immaculately presented, south-facing, three-bedroom, modern, end-terrace home with gardens. Set in a new residential, factored development, located in the sought-after Mortonhall area, south of Edinburgh city centre. The bright and welcoming entrance hall gives access to the carpeted stairway ..."
"Attractively presented traditional third floor flat superbly situated in the sought -after Newington area close to an excellent range of amenities including the Universities, ..."
"FIXED £10,000 BELOW HOME REPORT. Are you looking for a bit of peace and tranquillity in your new home?  Then look no further, this converted Church in Bruntsfield will serve you well"
"Set within a historic bond conversion, this appealing fourth-floor flat offers an exceptionally bright and spacious home at the heart of Edinburgh's cosmopolitan Shore district. Set within a pretty courtyard, the property enjoys a leafy, tranquil setting away from the bustling thoroughfare. A ..."
"A rare opportunity has arisen to purchase this charming and immaculately presented link-detached stone-built cottage, situated in the beautiful grounds of Southfield House in the popular residential district of Liberton, in the South of Edinburgh. Liberton offers easy access to local shops, ameni..."
"Belinda Belli Keller Williams is delighted to bring to the market this highly attractive, three-bedroom apartment in prestigious Cramond location. This property is within walking distance of scenic Cramond village and the river Almond"
"*MORE THAN £25,000 UNDER HOME REPORT VALUE*Located in desirable Liberton, this stone-built, semi-detached cottage exudes period charm with classically proportioned living space, retained period features, and a delightful walled garden. Enhanced by contemporary upgrades, the traditional three-bedr..."
Blair Cadell are delighted to bring to market this lovely two bed flat ideally placed for swift access to the city centre. Freshly decorated and carpeted the property is in turn ...
"Set in the heart of Portobello, moments from the beach, promenade and excellent local artisan cafes, restaurants and bars is this spacious first floor apartment. The property ..."
"Open Viewing Sunday 2-4pm. This charming and rarely available link-detached villa is quietly situated in a cul-de-sac in the popular and established district of Gilmerton, in the South of Edinburgh. The property is within easy reach of a range of shops, local amenities and local schools. The..."
"CLOSING FOR OFFERS WEDNESDAY 5TH APRIL AT 12 NOON. Enviably located just a short walk from the local schools and shops, this stylish mid terraced villa offers exceptionally spacious and flexible family accommodation and comes complete with a drive, an integral garage and a secluded sou..."
"Part exchange available! McEwan Fraser is delighted to present this modern three-bedroom mid-terraced house to the market. Less than a year old and located in Barratt Homes' sought-after Heritage Grange development, the property is presented in 'as new' condition and benefits from gas central hea..."
"Rarely available mid-terraced villa with driveway and private gardens, located in a tranquil cul-de-sac, with significant development potential, in the heart of a desirable ..."
"*Fixed Price - £10,000 below Home Report *Located in sought-after Trinity, this first floor flat is a wonderful residence for city professionals, couples, and small families ..."
"Providing beautifully presented, spacious accommodation over the ground and basement floors is this lovely main door flat. Forming part of a traditional tenement building, the property has been converted from an old shop and is located in the sought after Leith area of Edinburgh. With gas centr..."
"Part of the Rosebank Colonies conservation area, this main-door, first-floor, upper flat is a traditional B-listed property, which enjoys a highly sought-after location in Edinburgh’s Fountainbridge area. The two-bedroom home also features elegant interiors, as well as a private garden that..."
"** UNDER OFFER ** Spacious and well-presented, two-bedroom, second floor flat forming part of a traditional yet converted, factored, residential development, located in the quiet cul-de-sac in the area of Slateford, lying west of Edinburgh city centre. The spacious entrance hall gives access thr"
"Situated within the vibrant Shore area of Edinburgh, this spacious, well presented south facing fourth floor flat would make an excellent purchase for the first time buyer. The property is close to excellent local amenities and offers regular transport links to and from the city centre. The ac..."
"Exceptionally light and spacious traditional top floor flat with lovely views to Arthur’s Seat, situated in a highly regarded area with great local amenities and transport ..."
"Excellent semi-detached villa offering significant development potential. Enjoying views towards Craiglockhart Hill and forming part of a green square, this lovely home comprises; entrance hall with tiled flooring and under stair storage, dining kitchen, rear vestibule leading to downstairs wc, b..."
£5000 BELOW HOME REPORT VALUATION! A superb top floor flat which offers a stylish home situated within a traditional tenement in the highly regarded area of Morningside. This beautifully presented property provides a flexible home which could either be used as a spacious one bedroom or...
"Set in a quiet, exclusive development built by Cala Homes, surrounded by manicured communal grounds, excellent amenities, quick transport links and vast open green spaces is this ..."
"Quietly situated in Edinburgh’s vibrant Leith district, this Victorian lower villa promises a wonderfully light and airy city home, presented throughout with subtle interiors ..."
"Situated in the popular Broughton area and presented to the market in move in condition, this spacious two-bedroom main door basement flat represents an excellent investment opportunity or next home."
Spacious One Bedroom Flat In Edinburgh's Highly Sought After Area of Leith
"A beautiful Victorian two bedroom property, located in the heart of Edinburgh's City Centre with direct access to a shared rear garden."
"A unique corner apartment located on the ground floor of this tranquil development. Apartment 20 boasts modern open plan living, kitchen, dining area, private terrace and ample storage."
"Located within the popular Comiston area of Edinburgh is this most attractive and well-presented top floor flat. Forming part of a traditional tenement building, the flat has sash and case double glazed windows and electric night storage heaters. The accommodation includes an entrance..."
"Neilsons are delighted to offer on to the market this appealing first floor flat, which forms part of a handsome period building, enjoying a fantastic high amenity location in the ..."
Spacious Three Bedroom Mid-Terrace Family Home
"New Fixed Price - £10,000 below Home Report Value! Positioned on the top floor of a handsome traditional building in the heart of the highly soughtafter Newington area ..."
A perfect family home in move in condition. 
A fabulous top floor flat part of the old converted Barnton Hotel (“C” listed building built in 1895) in the prestigious Barnton district of the City. Converted by McCarthy ...
"Two Bed Top Floor Art Deco Flat with Balcony and Superb Views Over the HillsLocated close to all the amenities of Morningside, this 1930’s two bed top floor flat has lots of ..."
Fantastic opportunity to purchase a beautifully presented one bedroom ground floor tenement flat located in Morningside. The flat will appeal to a wide range of buyers due its popular location as well as having direct access to the lovely residents garden. The flat is approached via commun...
"6/1 Ogilvie Terrace is a well-presented first-floor flat forming part of a traditional Victorian tenement. Situated in the popular area of Shandon to the southwest of the city centre, the flat features a spacious living room, dining kitchen and generously proportioned box room."
"WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR HELP WITH YOUR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS - YOU CHOOSE! WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £13,999 PLUS WE'LL INCLUDE FLOORING. OR, IF YOU'VE GOT A HOME TO SELL BEFORE YOU MOVE, WE COULD BE YOUR GUARANTEED BUYER WITH PART EXCHANGE.
This two-bedroom apartment feat..."
"Maloco and Associates are delighted to bring this upgraded, four bedroom flat offering flexible accommodation and fantastic aspects. Located within a residential cul-de-sac the property will suit a range of buyers including young professionals and those with growing families due to the flexibl..."
"WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR HELP WITH YOUR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS - YOU CHOOSE! WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £13,899 PLUS WE'LL INCLUDE FLOORING. OR, IF YOU'VE GOT A HOME TO SELL BEFORE YOU MOVE, WE COULD BE YOUR GUARANTEED BUYER WITH PART EXCHANGE. SPEAK TO A SALES ADVISER FOR FU..."
Fully converted and upgraded 1-bed mews apartment in Edinburgh's trendy West End with easy access to Haymarket Station and a short walk to Lothian Road. Fantastic investment for short-term & long-term landlords or; as buy to live in.
A beautiful and bright and sunny two double bedroom apartment located on the ground floor with private parking. A modern well-presented two double bedroom apartment located within the desirable Stockbridge-Comely Bank neighbourhood. The property is located on the ground level within a fully fac...
"Light and tastefully presented, three-bedroom, second-floor apartment, set in a modern, factored residential development. Located in the Abbeyhill area close to Holyrood Park, lying to the east of Edinburgh city centre. A welcoming entrance hall gives access throughout the property, and f..."
"Enjoy a modern lifestyle in the heart of Edinburgh’s Dalry with this attractive two bedroom apartment on the second floor of a popular development. Quietly tucked away in a cul-de-sac off Dalry Road, it is in superb turn-key condition with a tasteful interior design and bright accommodation. Situ..."
"An excellent opportunity has arisen to purchase this rarely available two bedroom end terrace house benefiting from generous garden grounds to rear, driveway and a single garage. The property requires upgrading to realise its full potential. EPC rating = E Council tax band = E"
"This well presented two bedroom ground floor flat is ideally located in the Canonmills district of Edinburgh, the property is estimated to achieve up to £1,400 pcm, equating a potential 6% yield, making this property an attractive investment opportunity."
"Recently changed to a fixed price £5k below Home Report ValuationBeautifully presented top floor flat with private garage, forming part of a select modern ..."
"A unique opportunity to purchase a two-bedroom converted end-terraced, single storey steading in a popular residential area of Cammo. "
This is a bright top floor two-bedroom property in the prime residential location of Orchard Brae. Quietly situated in an established development it benefits from well-proportioned accommodation. The landscaped shared grounds and private residents’ parking add to its appeal as does its position m...
"This well proportioned and beautifully presented main door apartment forms part of an impressive modern block, situated on an established and sought-after development in the ..."
"Situated in the popular residential area of Newington, this is a well-presented traditional three-bedroom apartment. On the second floor of a stone-built tenement the accommodation is bright and spacious with an appealing neutral décor and original period features. Its proximity to the University..."
"This lovely home has been finished to a good standard throughout and provides comfortable and stylishly presented living space which would make an ideal home for a couple or family and has the added attraction of an enclosed, child friendly rear garden. EPC - C COUNCIL TAX - D"
"A well-presented, two bedroom, fourth floor, lift served apartment with allocated garaged parking space situated within the desirable Britannia Quay development adjacent to Ocean Terminal. Ideal for first / second time movers or those looking to downsize"
"This well proportioned second floor flat forms part of a traditional tenement, within the sought after area of Polwarth, within easy reach of the City Centre, excellent local amenities and transport links. EPC rating = C Council Tax Band = C"
Most impressive extended semi-detached villa offering superb familysized accommodation and a south facing rear garden in a prime location close to excellent amenities.This is a ...
"A seldom available, yet highly desirable Colonies flat, this two-bedroom main door lower villa enjoys a tranquil setting, in the popular Shandon Colonies, close to lovely Harrison Park. Approached via a cobbled lane the property sits behind a white picket gate and sunny private front garden. T..."
A well-presented two-bedroom apartment in a popular modern development in Canonmills. This home off ers bright and comfortable accommodation with a fresh neutral décor. In move-in condition it boasts picturesque views of the Water of Leith and St Marks Park as well as a lift and residents ...
Warners are delighted to present to market this fantastic family starter home - stylishly presented three bed mid terraced villa occupying a quiet spot on this sought after ...
"Third/top-floor flat forming part of a handsome, traditional tenement building in Corstorphine with wonderful far-reaching views, enjoying two bedrooms, an open-plan living area, and a contemporary kitchen and bathroom, plus access to a shared garden and unrestricted on-street parking. Close to s..."
A fantastic opportunity has arisen to acquire this excellent two bedroom main door lower villa well situated within a quiet residential pocket of the much sought after ...
"Open viewing Sunday 2-4pm. Forming part of a cul-de-sac setting, this light and airy semi detached villa is situated within the sought after residential area of Swanston. The property is close to an abundance of excellent amenities at Straiton Retail Park with the City Bypass on the doorstep p..."
"This is an attractive and extended semi-detached family home with four bedrooms, private gardens, conservatory and superbly located in the popular Brunstane area. EPC = D COUNCIL TAX = D"
Modern One Bedroom Retirement Property in Edinburgh's Popular Area of Morningside
" Characterized by outstanding proportions and a wealth of flexible accommodation, this traditional third floor tenement flat represents an exciting opportunity to acquire a period home with fabulous views. The flat has retained a selection of charming original features, including ornate ..."
"Tastefully presented and rarely available, one-bedroom, ground-floor garden flat, forming part of a traditional stone-built tenement. Conveniently located in the vibrant and fashionable area of Canonmills, adjacent to Stockbridge just to the north of Edinburgh city centre. The hall gives acces..."
"WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR HELP WITH YOUR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS - YOU CHOOSE! WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £13,549 PLUS WE'LL INCLUDE FLOORING. OR, IF YOU'VE GOT A HOME TO SELL BEFORE YOU MOVE, WE COULD BE YOUR GUARANTEED BUYER WITH PART EXCHANGE.
The Roxburgh is a two bedroom a..."
"Particularly appealing 1st floor flat retaining some period features and timber flooring, forming part of a traditional tenement, located in a wide tree lined street.This ..."
"Rarely available, beautifully presented and spacious, two-bedroom basement flat with a private patio garden. Forming part of an impressive and unique grade A listed stone-built tenement, Pilrig area, by Leith Walk, north of Edinburgh city centre. A vestibule entrance is accessed via ..."
"(RECENTLY CHANGED TO A FIXED PRICE £10,000 UNDER HOME REPORT VALUATION)This bright and spacious first floor flat is ideal for the 1st or 2nd time purchaser or for a discerning landlord looking for a perfect investment flat, situated in one of Edinburgh’s most popular residential areas..."
"Set on a quiet, leafy street, moments from excellent amenities, quick transport links, Portobello beach and vast open green spaces is this immaculate end terraced house. Boasting ..."
A very well presented main door lower villa set within a highly sought after residential area which is set close to amenities and very well placed for commuting. The property benefits from gas central heating and has double glazing. Externally there are well maintained gardens as wel...
"Stunning 2 bedroom Apartment, a stone throw from the Royal Mile"
"The subject of the sale is a most impressive 3rd floor flat, forming part of a select modern development, served by an entry phone security system and located in the fashionable ..."
"A lovely modern three-bedroom semi-detached house with a well-kept wrap-around private garden and double driveway quietly located in Mortonhall, on the southern edge of the city. ..."
"6/12 Millar Place is a lovely 1st floor, two bedroom property in the popular Morningside area, south of Edinburgh City Centre. The property offers comfortable living and comes ..."
"Set on a quiet, leafy cul-de-sac with private parking this spacious property neighbours a local nature reserve and offers the charm of a small village feel, whilst also ..."
"This three-bedroom mid-terrace house in East Craigs is brought to market with neutral interiors throughout. The home boasts two reception rooms, two bathrooms (plus a WC), and a south-facing aspect. Furthermore, it has a private garage and a fully-enclosed rear garden that has a low-maintenance d..."
"A wonderfully spacious and bright top floor flat, ideally located within easy reach of Edinburgh City Centre. This beautiful property is flooded with natural light and retains a wealth of character features including intricate cornicing, original wooden flooring and feature fires. The accommodati..."
"Recently gone to fixed price £5k under value. Beautifully presented terraced villa, extended to the rear to create a lovely home of immense appeal, forming part of a ..."
"1 / 4 Hunter Square is an extremely well-presented top floor flat with the added benefit of owning the roof void above, possibly creating the opportunity to develop the property subject to obtaining the necessary permissions. Conveniently located in the heart of Edinburgh’s historic Old Town dist..."
Blair Cadell are delighted to bring to market this bright one bed 2nd floor flat. The property is located in the highly desirable Bruntsfield area of the city close to excellent ...
"This stunning second floor flat sits quietly within a charming landscaped development in the popular district of Blackhall. The property is presented in true move in condition with high quality fixtures and fittings and benefits from a single garage, gas central heating and new double glazing. ..."
"An immaculately presented, 53 SQM, one bedroom, ground-floor apartment forming part of a factored and lift serviced development, in the sought after Fountainbridge area of Edinburgh, lying south of the city centre."
"The Newington is a great option with three bedrooms and an integral garage. The lounge opens out onto the garden and has room for a dining table, the kitchen has garden access, there’s a downstairs WC and storage space. The master bedroom has an en-suite, there's a family bathroom and more storage."
"McEwan Fraser is delighted to present this stunning ground floor studio flat to the market. The property occupies a prime position off Fettes Row in Edinburgh's sought after New Town. Presented in excellent order, making it ideal for both owner/occupiers and buy to let investors, it would also ma..."
"Situated in the popular Northfield area of the city, this end of terrace three-bedroom villa, offers a fabulous family home, with easy-to-maintain outdoor space. A front door opens into a small hallway, with stairs leading up to the first floor. On the left is a bright lounge and dining room, enj..."
FIXED PRICE - NO BIDDING WARS. GROUND FLOOR. Luxurious APARTMENT in an excellent CITY LOCATION. DESIGNER KITCHEN & BATHROOMS. Spacious OPEN PLAN LIVING. Optional UNDERGROUND PARKING. 
"WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR HELP WITH YOUR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS - YOU CHOOSE! WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £13,299 PLUS WE'LL INCLUDE FLOORING. OR, IF YOU'VE GOT A HOME TO SELL BEFORE YOU MOVE, WE COULD BE YOUR GUARANTEED BUYER WITH PART EXCHANGE. SPEAK TO A SALES ADVISER FOR FU..."
A second floor flat part of a modern development in the highly regarded Brunswick district of the city perfectly positioned for access to Edinburgh City Centre and a wide range of ...
"Traditional two double bedroom tenement flat, set in the heart of Edinburgh's historical Old Town. *£10k Below HR* *Potential long term rental £1,225pm, 5.55% Yield, based on the fixed price* *Short term rental value between £125-£450 depending on the..."
"Purplebricks are proud to present this bright and well-proportioned ground floor flat situated in a highly centralised location. Close to Edinburgh University in the ever-popular district of Newington, to the south of Edinburgh City Centre, the property is close to a wealth of amenities includin..."
"This one-bedroom lower-ground floor flat forms part of a handsome, C-listed Victorian building in exclusive Stockbridge, within the New Town conservation area, and is sure to appeal to first-time buyers, city professionals, couples, and rental investors alike. The flat is ideally situated for e..."
"Boasting views across to Fife a rare opportunity has arisen to purchase this fantastic three bedroom semi-detached new home, with a fully enclosed rear garden and private ..."
"Freshly decorated two bedroom ground floor flat quietly set within a quiet residential area of Colinton Mains, Edinburgh. The flat is ideal for first time buyers, downsizers or investors and has the valuable added benefit of a large private front garden. Entered via communal stair to entra..."
"13L Laverockbank Crescent provides a rare opportunity for those seeking to purchase a unique “B” listed, two bedroom maisonette duplex designed by Sir Basil Spence and ..."
A bright and freshly decorated upper villa offering well-proportioned 2 bed accommodation in a popular location close to excellent transport links and within easy reach of ...
"Spacious, two-bedroom, dual-aspect, first-floor flat with a private balcony, set on a residential street, located in the Inverleith area, to the north of Edinburgh city centre. The entrance hall serves each room within the property, has a secure entry phone handset, a storage cupboard and mode..."
"Situated in Corstorphine, this semi-detached house enjoys three bedrooms, a large, dual-aspect reception area, a kitchen, and a modern shower room, plus a low-maintenance rear garden, an attached single garage, and a private driveway. The home would benefit from some modernisation and cosmetic..."
5/3 Brunstane Road North is a bright and spacious ground floor flat situated within a few minutes' walk from Portobello beach. The accommodation comprises: entrance stairwell; ...
"Forming part of a B listed building, this charming ground floor flat is located in the popular district of Newington, in the South of Edinburgh. A short distance from the city centre, the location offers a great selection of local shops and amenities and is conveniently located for many Universit..."
A bright and well-presented modern first floor flat offering well-proportioned living accommodation and forming part of an award-winning residential development located just off Slateford Road. Council tax band = E EPC rating = B
"FIXED PRICE, NO BIDDING WAR. Luxurious APARTMENT in an excellent CITY LOCATION. DESIGNER KITCHEN & BATHROOMS. Spacious OPEN PLAN LIVING. Optional UNDERGROUND PARKING. "
"We could pay towards your mortgage, deposit or help with your moving & running costs - you choose! We could contribute up to £13,199 plus we'll include flooring. Speak to a Sales Adviser for full details.
The Ayton is a two bedroom apartment offering a bright and flexible space designed for moder..."
"An opportunity has arisen to acquire this stunning two-bedroom upper flat in a highly desirable, central location just a stone’s throw away from Leith Links. Ideal for ..."
"This exceptionally spacious ground floor apartment forms part of a small modern development in the popular district of Bonnington, within walking distance of both the city centre ..."
"Spacious and superior two-bedroom ground floor apartment, offered chain-free, within an attractive and established modern development with landscaped grounds and ample ..."
"A beautifully-presented two-bedroom apartment in the popular residential area of Polwarth. Occupying the first floor of a traditional tenement, this property has been upgraded by the current owners to create a home which boasts an appealing interior design, fine period details and bright comforta..."
"93/6 Milton Road East in a well presented, bright and generously proportioned second floor apartment, located in the popular residential district of Joppa. Forming part of a well ..."
"Now requiring some modernisation, this impressive second floor flat within an Art Deco building and ideally located in the sought after area of Comely Bank. Boasting impressive views to Fettes College and having residents parking and well-maintained communal grounds, this property is sure to appe..."
"Occupying an enviable position in the heart of Edinburgh’s iconic and historic Grassmarket, this is a beautifully presented one-bedroom category C listed apartment with world-class cultural attractions; bars, restaurants, and cafés all on the doorstep - this will make an exceptional home for prof..."
"Clyde Property Edinburgh welcomes to the market this excellently finished ground floor two bed apartment located in the heart of Morningside. The property forms part of this established residential development built in the 60s. As you enter the property via communal walkway, you are first..."
Spacious Three Bedroom Semi Detached
"Spacious, two-bedroom, ground-floor flat, forming part of an impressive, traditional, stone-built tenement. Located in the popular Shandon area, southwest of Edinburgh city centre. The hallway gives access throughout, and features a built-in store cupboard, the secured entry handset and w..."
"Well proportioned and a sunny, top (3rd) floor flat offers a truly outstanding location. Nestled in a idyllic dell setting near the Water of Leith, in much sought-after Roseburn, ..."
An excellent opportunity has arisen to purchase this bright and spacious extended terraced villa benefiting from a large predominately south-facing rear garden with lovely open ...
A spacious top floor flat situated within a traditional tenement located in the popular area of Comely Bank close to excellent amenities and within easy reach of the West End and City Centre. This delightful property offers the opportunity to create a stylish home in a sought after location. In...
"Well presented, four-bedroom, mid-terrace, converted farm cottage over two levels with a private garden. Located in the popular Newcraighall area, to the southeast of Edinburgh. The entrance vestibule opens up into the hall which provides access throughout the majority of the ground floor incl..."
"Finished to a high standard, this two-bedroom contemporary apartment offers a chic modern lifestyle in Edinburgh's popular residential area of Bonnington. "
"Re/max Scotland are delighted to present to the market this immaculate two bed top floor apartment in the Trinity area of Edinburgh, north of the city centre. Set within a modern factored development with south facing views The top floor accommodation comprises: Entrance hall with solid woo..."
"McDougall McQueen present to the market this bright and spacious two bedroom second (top) floor apartment forming part of a small modern, factored development (2007) boasting a superb corner site with a lovely southern aspect towards the Pentland Hills. The property is ideally located in the soug..."
"Part of a sought-after development in prestigious Morningside, this two-bedroom first-floor flat enjoys a highly desirable position in the capital, set within easy reach of ..."
"We could pay towards your mortgage, deposit or help with your moving & running costs - you choose! We could contribute up to £12,649 plus we'll include flooring.
Located in Block 2, this ground floor apartment features two double bedrooms. You'll benefit from a spacious, open-plan lounge/dining a..."
"WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR HELP WITH YOUR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS - YOU CHOOSE! WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £12,749, PLUS WE'LL INCLUDE FLOORING. SPEAK TO A SALES ADVISER FOR FULL DETAILS.
The Ayton is a two bedroom apartment offering a bright and flexible space designed for mode..."
"Immaculately presented, three-bedroom, mid-terrace home, with gardens and a driveway. Located in the popular Prestonfield area, just south of Edinburgh city centre, with views of Arthur's Seat. A welcoming entrance hall, with storage, is finished with the light neutral decor and stylish w..."
"Attractive ground floor flat, enjoying a prime position overlooking lovely landscaped gardens and located within an extremely popular residential area.This light and spacious ..."
"A superb and rarely available ground floor flat with residents parking and direct access from the sitting room, kitchen and master bedroom to well maintained communal gardens. Ideally located in popular modern development off Slateford Road, which is within walking distance of excellent local am..."
Ground floor flat with a garage and allocated parking space in a desirable area. Immaculately maintained communal areas. Modern kitchen and bathroom. This home is ready to occupy and not in a chain.
"Thoughtfully designed, the family-friendly Maybury has a stylish open-plan kitchen/dining room with French doors leading into the garden, a spacious lounge and a handy storage cupboard. The first floor boasts three good-sized bedrooms - bedroom one benefits from an en suite - and a family bathroom."
"This generously proportioned ground floor flat is situated within the popular district of Bonnington, close to exceptional local amenities and within easy reach of the city centre ..."
‘Period top floor tenement flat with sunny aspect beside Murieston Park’
"Plot B3.04  is an impressive, low carbon, 1-bedroom 3rd floor apartment within the groundbreaking Rowanbank Gardens development brought to you by award-winning Artisan Real Estate. MARKETING SUITE NOW OPEN"
"Lots of character, stylish fittings and generous sized living space are provided within this traditional one bedroom flat plus box room, superbly positioned to easily access a ..."
"Boasting panoramic sea views over Granton harbour this two bedroom, dual-facing fourth floor apartment with private balcony is moments from excellent local amenities and quick ..."
"Situated on the second floor of an modern development in coastal Newhaven is this well presented three-bedroom apartment. In move-in condition and with private parking, it boasts spacious and bright interiors. It is a short walk to Newhaven Harbour as well as Victoria Park. Ocean Terminal and The..."
"This well presented end terraced villa forms part of an exclusive courtyard development within the ever popular district of Blackhall, close to excellent amenities and transport ..."
Spacious 2-bedroom flat boasting original features within the desirable area off Meadowbank located beside Holyrood Park and only a short distance from Edinburgh's city centre
"Constitution Street is a well-presented and spacious, four bedroom top floor flat, located in the heart of the fashionable Shore area of Leith. Within a short walk of excellent ..."
"Enjoying fantastic views, this pleasant top (third) floor flat is located in a modern development in the popular district of Newington, in the South of Edinburgh. A short distance from the City Centre, Newington is a convenient location offering an excellent selection of local shops, restaurants ..."
Spacious One Bedroom Flat In Edinburgh's Highly Sought after Morningside
*JOIN US FOR COFFEE & CAKE – TUESDAY 2nd MAY - 10am – 4pm - BOOK YOUR PLACE TODAY!* Apartment 47 benefits a southerly aspect making this a lovely one bedroom bright apartment located on the second floor
"***FIXED 5K BELOW HOME REPORT VALUE*** Offering beautifully presented accommodation is this well proportioned third floor flat. Forming part of a traditional tenement building the flat has gas central heating, double glazed windows and lovely views to Salisbury Crags. The a..."
"Two Bed End Terraced House on Large Corner Plot, Now Requiring Upgrading.  Fantastic opportunity to acquire this super property with plenty of development potential to turn it ..."
"Stunning one bedroom property, with study, available in the Cannonmils area with beautiful views of Edinburgh Castle. A well proportioned, recently renovated third floor flat situated in a traditional tenement located in a quiet street in the sought after area of Comely Bank. The living room i..."
"Neilsons are delighted to offer onto the market this exceptionally appealing top floor flat, which forms part of a charming period building, enjoying a spectacular central ..."
‘Extended semi-detached villa with many benefits on popular estate close to Fort Kinnaird‘ 
"Open Viewing Sunday 2-4pm. This tastefully extended mid-terraced house is located in Liberton in south Edinburgh, close to a variety of local amenities, Edinburgh Royal Infirmary and Cameron Toll Shopping Centre. The accommodation on the ground floor comprises; spacious living room openi..."
"Beautifully presented mid terrace villa with three bedrooms, forming part of Barratt's Greenacre development, enjoying an extremely convenient location, close to a good range of amenities and excellent transport links. This bright and well-proportioned home is offered to the market in excellent d..."
"Forming part of a modern development with exclusive parking space and well maintained grounds is this bright and spacious top floor flat. Offering well-presented accommodation, the flat has electric heating and double glazed windows. The accommodation includes an entrance hallway an..."
"Bright South facing property situated in the highly desirable district of Barnton, close to excellent amenities and commuting links, 47 Lyle Court forms part of an exclusive ..."
This superb semi-detached house offers well-proportioned accommodation in a peaceful residential location close to superb amenities and transport links. Offered for sale in good ...
"Located within leafy suburb of Morningside, Edinburgh, Yopa delightfully announce this stunning Traditional Main Door Flat which commands immediate inspection"
"WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR HELP WITH YOUR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS - YOU CHOOSE! WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £12,449 PLUS WE'LL INCLUDE FLOORING. OR, IF YOU'VE GOT A HOME TO SELL BEFORE YOU MOVE, WE COULD BE YOUR GUARANTEED BUYER WITH PART EXCHANGE. THE AYTON IS A TWO BEDROOM APA..."
A very well located mid terrace villa set within a modern and sought after residential district close to amenities and very well placed for commuting.The property benefits from gas central heating and is fully double glazed. Externally there are private gardens to the front and rear and...
"Two-bedroom, mid-terrace house with private front and rear gardens. Situated in the well-established and popular residential Buckstone area of south Edinburgh "
"Neilsons are delighted to offer on to the market this immaculately presented first floor apartment which forms part of a well-kept purpose-built block, enjoying a superb high ..."
"Light, spacious and well planned 1st floor flat, forming part of a traditional tenement and located in a highly regarded residential area.This appealing property offers ..."
"Offering bright and spacious accommodation is this second floor flat. Located in the sought after Newington area, the property forms part of a traditional tenement building and includes gas central heating and double glazing. The accommodation includes a welcoming entrance hallway wit..."
The 2 bedroom Andrew is a perfect home for first-time buyers with its well-proportioned interior.
"Idyllic one bedroom, third floor apartment with contemporary open-plan living. The Portree, Apartment 20 is a spacious one bedroom, third floor apartment that boasts wonderful contemporary living spaces. This apartment, perfect for first time buyers, boasts an impressive open-plan kitchen/liv..."
"One bedroom, third floor apartment close to the city centre. The Craighouse, Apartment 22 is a spacious one bedroom, third floor apartment that boasts wonderful contemporary living spaces. This apartment, perfect for first time buyers, boasts an impressive open-plan kitchen/living/dining room..."
"Modern one bedroom, second floor apartment with feature windows. This contemporary one bedroom apartment is ideal for first time buyers and perfectly located nearby to Edinburgh City Centre. The Portree boasts an impressive open-plan lounge-dining-kitchen with feature window, a fantastic bath..."
"Plot B2.07 is an impressive, low carbon, 1 bedroom second floor apartment within the groundbreaking Rowanbank Gardens development brought to you by award-winning Artisan Real Estate. MARKETING SUITE NOW OPEN"
"Cl;osing date set Wednesday 5th April at 12 noon.A rarely available opportunity has arisen to acquire this immaculatelypresented, three bedroom terraced family home boasting a ..."
A fantastic opportunity has arisen to acquire this superb two bedroom second floor situated within the ever-popular district of Meadowbank. Close to excellent amenities and ...
An exciting opportunity has arisen to acquire this beautifully presented two-bedroom flat forming part of a traditional tenement in the highly desirable Leith area of ...
"Plot C1.05  is an impressive, low carbon, 1-bedroom 1st floor apartment within the groundbreaking Rowanbank Gardens development brought to you by award-winning Artisan Real Estate. MARKETING SUITE NOW OPEN"
"Enjoying a leafy setting in sought-after Corstorphine, this stylish two-bedroom first-floor flat forms part of a prestigious development with attractive communal gardens and allocated parking. Perfect for professionals and young families, the appealing home also includes a spacious open-plan livi..."
"A two-bedroom main door property in a popular waterfront location within the Trinity conservation area. Nestled in a private courtyard development with allocated parking, it has been fully renovated to offer immaculate accommodation. With attention to detail, contemporary fittings, wood-effect fl..."
"Offering style and space, this completely refurbished third floor flat lies in the highly desirable area of Meadowbank, to the east of Edinburgh city centre. The property is entered via a well-maintained communal stair. Upon entering the flat, the style and attention to detail is evident. The spa..."
"A bright, well-presented, clean and spacious three-bedroom, mid-terrace townhouse, with gardens to the front and rear offering around 1216 square feet of flexible family living space. Located in a quiet residential new development part of Edinburgh, this fabulous superb value family home is pr..."
"Unique and spacious, two-bedroom, first-floor (top), corner-aspect duplex apartment, set in a Victorian schoolhouse conversion. Located in the vibrant Leith Links area, north of Edinburgh's city centre. A bright entrance hall, with storage, is finished with light, neutral decor and modern..."
"Particularly appealing 1930s main door upper villa, enviably located in the sought-after area of Craiglockhart, set on a quiet no-through road, with unrestricted on street ..."
"This wonderfully light two-bedroom apartment occupies the third floor of a B-listed Georgian tenement and benefits from a south-west facing aspect. Entered via a historic cobble stone archway, this generously proportioned property is ideally located for the University of Edinburgh and Edinburgh C..."
"Closing Date set Friday 31st March @ 12 noon.Set in the heart of fashionable Leith, moments from excellent artisan cafes, bars and restaurants and within easy walking distance of ..."
"This bright and airy first floor flat is located in a modern development in Leith. The property is within walking distance from the City Centre, water of Leith and Pilrig Park. The accommodation on offer comprises, entrance hallway with storage cupboard, a large open plan living room/kitchen w..."
"Stunning one bedroom, second floor apartment available with the choice of flooring or LBTT paid*. The Rothesay, Apartment 13 is a spacious one bedroom, second floor apartment that boasts wonderful contemporary living spaces. This apartment, perfect for first time buyers, boasts an impressive ..."
"A bright and spacious, two-bedroom, upper villa with a prime location in popular Davidson’s Mains, situated within easy reach of amenities, schooling, idyllic green spaces, and transport links. The home features lightly decorated interiors with a fully-enclosed private garden that has a ..."
"This well-presented double aspect second floor flat is situated in an established and secure gated courtyard development in the popular residential district of Dalry, in the South-West of Edinburgh. The convenient location offers an array of shops, restaurants and local amenities, with Fountainpa..."
A seldom available opportunity has arisen to acquire this stunningly presented first floor flat on Edinburgh's historic Royal Mile - a UNESCO World Heritage Site.Forming part of a ...
"Located on the first floor of a traditional tenement in the residential location of Marchmont this is a bright one-bedroom apartment. Adjacent to The Meadows it has been tastefully redecorated with an upgraded shower room and new boiler added to provide comfortable accommodation. Its enviable, pe..."
"Bright and beautifully-presented, two bedroom, third-floor flat, set in a modern, factored residential development, located in the popular Newhaven area, adjacent to the waterfront, north of Edinburgh city centre. The entrance hall gives access throughout, featuring two built-in store cupboards..."
"We are delighted to offer onto the market this well presented semi detached villa, in need of modernisation, which offers flexible family accommodation over two floors.
It has a driveway to the front and an enclosed family friendly garden to the rear in need of TLC.
Early viewing is recommended. ..."
"New FIxed Price £240,000 (£10K below HRV). Bright One Bed Third Floor Flat in Desirable Shandon..  This spacious flat would make an ideal first time ..."
"McEwan Fraser is delighted to present this quietly position, two-bedroom, second floor flat to the market. The property forms part of a modern apartment block in Comiston, a sought-after area, to the south of Edinburgh city centre and close to the amenities of Morningside, Buckstone and Fairmileh..."
An ideal opportunity to purchase this most attractive bright and spacious two-bedroom terraced villa in excellent order throughout. This charming property occupies a pleasant position within this sought-after district of Gilmerton and within very easy reach of the city centre. An ideal first purc...
" *** Turn Key Semi Detached Villa *** *** Call To Book Your Viewing *** Carol Lawton and RE/MAX Property are delighted to offer for sale this spacious and very well presented, semi detached house offering fantastic family accommodation in a highly sought after location. The property benefits fr..."
"**INVESTMENT ONLY - PROPERTY IS BEING SOLD AS A RENTAL PROPERTY WITH TENANTS IN SITU, SO IS NOT SUITABLE FOR THOSE WHO WISH TO LIVE IN IT** A great investment opportunity to purchase a spacious and well-proportioned two-bedroom ground floor flat in a modern development, close to Leith ..."
"Situated in Newington, this ground floor flat is a bright and airy home that is sure to appeal to a wide demographic, including downsizers, commuting professionals, young ..."
"This traditional third/top-floor tenement flat lies in popular Tollcross: a bustling central area close to the Meadows with excellent transport links and local amenities for shopping and entertainment. The appealing city home includes two bedrooms, and benefits from shared garden access."
"Fixed Price £240,000. Exceptionally Well Presented Two Bed Ground Floor Maindoor Flat in Popular Morningside Location.  Beautiful traditional flat finished in a contemporary ..."
A fantastic opportunity has arisen to acquire this superb two bedroom upper villa nicely positioned within quiet residential street of the ever-popular Balgreen district of the ...
"A bright and spacious, two-bedroom upper villa with a prime location in popular Davidson's Mains, situated within easy reach of amenities, schooling, idyllic green spaces, and transport links. The home features lightly decorated interiors, with a dining kitchen and a four-piece bathroom equipped ..."
Occupying a good sized corner plot with lock blocked driveway is this well-presented semi detached house. Located within the popular Redhall area of Edinburgh the house offers bright and spacious accommodation ideal for the growing family. With gas central heating and double glazed wi...
"HD Virtual Tour AvailableAsset Properties are proud to market a two-bedroom ground floor flat in Edinburgh located off Leith Walk. The accommodation comprises of - Hall, Kitchen, Living Room, two Bedrooms (one with En-Suite) and Bathroom.* Two bedrooms * Modern development* Excellent locat"
"**Newly Fixed Price** 18 (3F2) Bruntsfield Place is a charming and exceptionally bright 3rd floor flat, forming part of a traditional Edinburgh tenement building."
"A fantastic buy-to-let opportunity, this well-presented, two-bedroom, fourth (top) floor flat, has previously been on the landlord register and a renewal fee has been paid. Set in a traditional stone-built tenement, located in the sought-after and vibrant Tollcross area, close to the heart of ..."
"Spacious, immaculately presented, two-bedroom, main door, ground-floor flat. Forming part of a traditional, stone-built tenement, located in the Slateford area, just west of Edinburgh city centre. A welcoming entrance vestibule leads into a high-ceilinged, carpeted hallway, with storage, which..."
"*JOIN US FOR COFFEE & CAKE – TUESDAY 2nd MAY - 10am – 4pm - BOOK YOUR PLACE TODAY!* **NEW PRICE - AVAILABLE FOR SALE OR TO RENT TO PURCHASE *** A superbe spacious one bedroom retirement apartment with Juliet balcony, boasting a pleasant view overlooking the entrance courtyard. There is ..."
"Most impressive lower colony style villa with sunny private garden, forming part of a stone fronted building and located within walking distance of a wonderful range of ..."
"Beautifully presented and spacious, one-bedroom, second-floor apartment, forming part of modern, factored residential development. Conveniently located on a quiet side street, in the popular Shandon area, just west of Edinburgh city centre. A welcoming entrance hall affords access throughout t..."
"This truly stunning ground floor flat forms part of a traditional tenement well placed in the fashionable district of Stockbridge, only a short walk from the finest amenities of ..."
"Superb one bedroom retirement apartment located on the second floor within the Annexe connected to Stewart Terrace in the sought after area of Morningside, Edinburgh"
"McDougall McQueen present to the market this rarely available four bedroom terraced townhouse arranged over three floors with a fully enclosed rear private garden forming part of an established residential area which is popular with professionals, families and buy to let investors. The property i..."
Thur 6pm - 7pm & Sun 2pm - 4pm or BY APPT PLEASE CONTACT SELLER ON .Neilsons are delighted to offer on to the market this charming first floor flat which forms ...
"Centrally located in Edinburgh’s sought-after New Town, with a quiet position and access to a shared garden, this traditional second-floor tenement flat is tastefully presented with classic décor and authentic features, and includes one double bedroom, a newly carpeted living/ dining..."
"This immaculate and well appointed two bedroom third floor flat in a modern, lift serviced and factored apartment block with balcony overlooking the rear of the development. Consisting of entrance hall, living/kitchen room with balcony, en-suite master bedroom, second double bedroom and shower ro..."
"*£5,000 BELOW HOME REPORT VALUE*A spacious and well-lit two-bedroom flat on the top floor of a unique converted building. The flat is an ideal purchase for a profitable ..."
"*JOIN US FOR COFFEE & CAKE – TUESDAY 2nd MAY - 10am – 4pm - BOOK YOUR PLACE TODAY!* * Now Fixed Price * Superb first floor one bedroom retirement living plus apartment with Juliet balcony. Excellent facilities on offer including a table service restaurant, sun room, roof terrace, hair ..."
McDougall McQueen present to the market this bright and spacious two bedroom fourth floor apartment boasting wonderful views with lift access and secure entry system. The property forms part of a sought after modern factored development close to excellent local amenities and quick transport links...
"*JOIN US FOR COFFEE & CAKE – TUESDAY 2nd MAY - 10am – 4pm - BOOK YOUR PLACE TODAY!* A well presented one bedroom, second floor retirement apartment with Juliet balcony. The superb facilities within Lyle Court include a table service restaurant, sun room, roof terrace and hair and beauty..."
"This exceptionally spacious and bright ground floor flat occupies a well-maintained block of only four properties, in the highly desirable district of Corstorphine close to ..."
"Part of the highly sought-after Western Harbour development in Newhaven, this modern, two-bedroom apartment boasts a waterside setting and is an ideal home for professionals, couples, and small families."
"Bright and spacious, four-bedroom, duplex flat with private balconies, on the ground and first floor, set quietly within a purpose-built apartment complex, located in the sought-after Bellevue area. The entrance hall has the stairs leading to the upper floor and laminate flooring extending thr..."
Yopa Edinburgh are delighted to bring to the open market this fantastic 2 bedroom ground floor flat in a sought after area. Early Viewing Advised!!!
"Set on a quiet, cul-de-sac moments from excellent artisan cafes, bars and restaurants and within easy walking distance of the city centre is this stylish top floor apartment. ..."
"3 Bedroom terraced villa situated in a preferred position within an established modern development, which enjoys an extremely convenient location, close to a good range of amenities and excellent transport links to the city centre, bypass and beyond. Perfect for couple or young family."
A delightful two bedroom duplex set on the shores of The Firth of Forth in Trinity offering beautifully decorated and stylish living space on the level. Internal viewing is the only way to truly appreciate this property
"Excellent 1st floor flat, commanding a bright south facing aspect, forming part of a select modern development and boasting fine views to open amenity ground.This impressive flat ..."
"Set on the third/top-floor of a traditional tenement building in sought-after Morningside, this neutrally decorated flat enjoys wonderful views of the Pentland Hills and is sure ..."
"This generously proportioned mid-terraced house with private gardens is situated right next to the Water of Leith, within the popular residential area of Bonnington. The house is ..."
The Portobello is an easy home to live in. The lounge has useful built-in storage and there’s direct garden access from the kitchen. A convenient cloakroom is off the kitchen too. You can take up the option to have fitted wardrobes in the two bedrooms. Solar panels complete this efficient new home.
"Nestled on a cul-de-sac in sought-after Blackhall, this main-door, first-floor, mews-style flat enjoys a desirable location in the capital that is sure to appeal to commuting ..."
Beautifully presented two bedroom end of terrace villa located within a tranquil cul-de-sac development. The property is tastefully presented and enjoys sociable living spaces and ...
"The subject of sale forms a stylish second floor contemporary apartment, part of a former Print works conversion and within close proximity to Edinburgh University. The building ..."
Blair Cadell are delighted to bring to market this exceptional ground floor apartment that forms part of a purpose-built McCarthy Stone Assisted Living development for the over ...
"Tastefully presented, three-bedroom, mid-terrace house, with a garden and a driveway. Set within a modern residential development, located in Burdiehouse, south of Edinburgh centre. The entrance hall gives access to the stairs leading to the upper hall, and to the front-facing living room..."
"Set in the heart of Portobello, moments from the beach, promenade and excellent artisan cafes is this spacious top floor traditional tenement apartment. Boasting a well-kept ..."
"Forming part of a traditional tenement building, this double aspect first floor flat is located in the popular residential district of Dalry, in the heart of Edinburgh. Dalry has benefitted from continued development over recent years and is ideal for young couples and professionals. The convenie..."
Yopa Edinburgh are proud to present to the open market this stunning First Floor Apartment which commands early viewing
"Part Exchange available! McEwan Fraser is delighted to present this well-proportioned semi-detached house to the market. Presented in excellent condition, the property boasts three double bedrooms, gas central heating, double glazing, driveway, and private front and rear gardens."
"**BEAUTIFUL 2 BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT!!** Niall McCabe & Property Connections are delighted to present to the market this beautiful 2-bedroom, 2 bathroom city-centre apartment. The property has been stylishly decorated internally and further benefits from having spacious roomsizes."
"Located within the popular Ardmillan area of Edinburgh is this most attractive and well-presented first floor flat. Forming part of a traditional tenement building, the flat has double glazed windows and gas central heating and would make an ideal first time home or buy to let investment. <..."
"Forming part of McCarthy Stone's exclusive retirement development in Barnton, this superb one bedroom second floor apartment is exceptionally bright, spacious and is of move-in condition throughout."
"Open viewing Thursday 6-8pm & Sunday 1-3pm This appealing ground floor flat is located in a modern factored development within the sought-after location of Bonnington. The property is within easy reach of an abundance of excellent amenities, close to the fashionable Shore area with many re..."
"A fantastic opportunity has arisen to acquire this two bedroom top floor tenement flat, situated within a quiet pocket of the much sought-after district of Polwarth. A ..."
"*JOIN US FOR COFFEE & CAKE – TUESDAY 2nd MAY - 10am – 4pm - BOOK YOUR PLACE TODAY!* Lovely bright second floor apartment with easy access to all the communal facilities on offer including the residents' lounge, restaurant, roof terrace and sun room and more."
"22 Alva Place is a contemporary and delightfully presented 1 bedroom maindoor colony apartment, situated in the vibrant Abbeyhill colonies, forming part of the artisan community ..."
BUY TO LET | VIRTUAL VIEWING AVAILABLE 116 (3F1) Rose Street South Lane is a fantastic opportunity to secure an investment offering a strong yield in the City Centre of Edinburgh 
"Perfect for first-time buyers or city professionals, this spacious apartment features lift access and a secure entry door system. The double bedroom is complete with fitted wardrobes and across the hallway, you’ll find the bathroom. An open-plan living space combines the kitchen, lounge and dinin..."
A bright and well-presented one bedroom apartment in the heart of the historic Old Town. This charming top floor B-listed property in one of Edinburgh’s most iconic streets just off the Royal Mile offers attractive and comfortable accommodation. Set within a historic baronial style building from ...
"*£5,000 BELOW HOME REPORT*Spacious end terraced villa noew requiring modernisation offering excellent development potential. Offering ideal family size accommodation, the property offers the opportunity to create a bespoke home and comprises; entrance hall hallway, lounge, dining kitch..."
"The front door is reached via a secure communal stairwell, and on entering the home, you step into the entrance hall with built-in storage. Leading off the hall is a bright living room with double glazed windows, working shutters, cornice and wooden flooring. The master double bedroom with walk i..."
A delightful studio apartment in superb central location
"2 bedroom apartment located within the prestigious development off New Mart, ideally located within communicating distance to the city centre and all transport links."
A fantastic and rare opportunity has arisen to acquire this well-proportioned three bedroom top floor flat situated a stones throw from Leith Walk. With excellent amenities and ...
"22 Collier Place is a spacious, modern two bedroom detached house, set in a quiet residential development in Niddrie, east of Edinburgh city centre. The well-presented ..."
A fantastic opportunity has arisen to acquire this excellent one bedroom top floor flat situated within the highly sought-after district of Stockbridge. Boasting superb amenities ...
"This superb, bright and well presented 2 bedroom ground floor apartment forms part of a popular modern development located close to a variety of amenities and within easy reach of ..."
"McEwan Fraser is delighted to present this one-bedroom ground floor apartment which forms part of a unique, modern residential development situated in the highly desirable West End of Edinburgh. The property offers clean, contemporary living space within walking distance of the city centre and th..."
‘Upper villa flat with period character and sea view only yards away from the sandy beach’
"Enjoying an established residential setting in Gilmerton, this two bedroom, detached bungalow boasts spacious interiors and open-plan living space, in addition to low maintenance gardens, and driveway, the property represents a fabulous family home in a popular, well-connected location. Quietl..."
A third floor flat part of a listed converted whisky warehouse within the vibrant Leith district of the city perfectly positioned for access to a wide range of local amenities and ...
"Purplebricks present this particularly appealing ground floor flat, forming part of a modern courtyard development with private residents parking facilities. This attractive South facing flat enjoys a bright facing and features French windows which open onto a private paved front garden. Modern k..."
"Two Bedroom Modern Apartment in Desirable Platinum Point, Edinburgh. This modern apartment with two double bedrooms offers fantastic uninterrupted views. Located on the second floor and accessible by lift the flat enters into a spacious hallway. This opens into an open plan kitchen an..."
"Polwarth Crescent is a pristine Main door apartment, beautifully presented in this much sought after location with many amenities on the doorstep. A lucrative buy-to-let investment and / or a pied-à-terre in a strategic part of the Capital."
"Light and spacious, two-bedroom, end-terrace villa, set on a corner plot with gardens. Located in an established residential area of Liberton, south of Edinburgh city centre. The entrance gives access to both public rooms, and to a deep built-in store cupboard. Front facing, the lounge fe..."
"Attractively presented two bed upper flat boasting a sunny public room, balcony with leafy outlook and shared garden, conveniently positioned close to excellent local amenities ..."
"Annan are pleased to market 282 2F2 Leith Walk which is a bright and spacious second floor flat, set within a traditional C listed tenement.Ideally located for a short walk into ..."
"67/17 Giles Street is a stylish duplex apartment, which forms part of the 'Academia' school conversion (circa 2003). Located in the heart of The Shore, the property is ideally ..."
"This modern two-bedroom, two-bathroom ground-floor flat boasts an enviable city address adjacent to the scenic Water of Leith and within strolling distance of The Shore’s ..."
"Two-bedroom ground floor apartment forming part of a delightful and well-regarded factored development on the periphery of Corstorphine, set in its own grounds with private parking"
This superb mid-terraced house offers bright and well-proportioned accommodation in a popular modern development situated in the popular Gilmerton district. Local amenities and ...
"An exciting opportunity has arisen to acquire this two-bedroom maindoor, ground floor flat forming part of a block of four in the popular Warriston area of Edinburgh.This spacious ..."
"14/7 St Clair Road is a beautifully presented top floor flat forming part of a well-maintained modern development. The apartment benefits from permit parking within the development, a spacious living room, two bedrooms and two bathrooms.   "
"Well presented and spacious, three-bedroom, main door double upper villa, with gardens and a driveway. Located in the popular Easter Drylaw area, northwest of Edinburgh city centre. A ground-floor entrance affords access to the carpeted stairs leading to the hall which offers space f..."
"Situated in a quiet cul de sac development in sought-after Murrayfield, this two-bedroom ground floor flat, offers light and airy accommodation in an ideal location. The famous Murrayfield stadium and Edinburgh zoo, are a short stroll away, as well as, quick and easy access into the city centre...."
"Set off bustling Leith Walk, in a modern cul-de-sac development, this two bedroom top/third floor flat, lies within walking distance of Leith's vibrant ‘Shore' area. Also benefiting from swift access into the city, the flat offers an ideal home for professionals or those hoping to invest in the r..."
Sean Lyon and RE/MAX Property Marketing Centre Edinburgh are delighted to present to market this bright and spacious two bedroom ground floor flat situated within this popular modern development in the desirable Leith ward of Edinburgh. The property is within walking distance from an abundance of...
"Light and spacious, south-facing two-bedroom, second-floor apartment, with a private balcony. Forming part of the modern and factored Strada development, located in the ..."
"Forming part of the Strada development in the popular Fettes area of Edinburgh is this bright, spacious and well-presented fourth floor flat. The flat benefits from stylish decoration throughout, gas central heating, double glazing and a security entrance system. The accommodation c..."
"Beautifully presented, two-bedroom, main door, upper villa, with a well-maintained garden, a garage and a driveway. Located in the popular Easter Drylaw area, northwest of Edinburgh city centre. A welcoming, carpeted staircase and an entrance hall, with storage, are finished with the light, so..."
"Closing Date: Monday 3rd April at 12 noon.A two-bedroom top/fourth-floor retirement flat within a popular retirement complex, which enjoys a lovely setting in the capital, positioned within easy reach of Edinburgh’s Royal Botanic Garden, local amenities, and regular transport link..."
" McDougall McQueen present to the market this two bedroom third (top) floor flat with lovely open views forming part of a traditional tenement. The property is ideally located within the popular area of Willowbrae close to many local amenities, Edinburgh city centre and commuting links. The ..."
"A well-presented one bedroom main door flat, centrally located in the Canonmills district of Edinburgh’s city centre. The property would be well suited to first time buyers and buy-to-let investors. This property is tastefully decorated and is located in a quiet cul-de-sac in the centre of Edinb..."
A two-bedroom mid-terraced house over two floors with spacious private garden. The property could now benefit from some cosmetic upgrading but has considerable potential to be a lovely family home. On the ground floor is a large sitting and dining room along with the breakfasting kitchen. Upstair...
"Impressive mid terraced villa enjoying a particularly quiet location within a small cul-de-sac on this very popular residential estate.Accommodation comprises: entrance vestibule, ..."
"Beautifully presented and spacious top floor flat forming part of a luxury-built development surrounded by landscaped grounds. An Excellent Opportunity for young professionals, First Time Buyers and Investors alike. Viewing is highly recommended to fully appreciate what the property offers. ..."
"A superbly located and rarely available upper flat, set within a peaceful residential cul-de-sac in a highly popular part of the City. The property will appeal to a wide variety of buyers. EPC = E COUNCIL TAX BAND = E"
"Set on the ground floor of a handsome, Victorian tenement building in Meadowbank, this well-presented flat enjoys attractive, modern presentation paired with some characterful ..."
A fantastic opportunity has arisen to acquire this excellent two bedroom terraced house situated in a quiet residential cul-de-sac within the popular district of South Gyle. Close ...
"A centrally located one bedroom flat in the heart of the New Town. The property is situated in the charming Thistle Street with the many amenities of George Street and Princes Street easily accessible. The property would be ideal for the first time buyer looking for a central location, as well as..."
"A one-bedroom apartment situated in the heart of Edinburgh’s iconic Old Town just off the prestigious Royal Mile, a UNESCO World Heritage Site. Constructed during the 1860s and once an ancient wynd, St Mary’s Street is steeped in history. The property is located on the third floor of a Scottish B..."
"Perfectly-proportioned, the Polwarth has a separate kitchen with a door leading into the garden, two double bedrooms, family bathroom and a good-sized lounge. Ideal if you're a first-time buyer looking for a fresh modern home you can make your own."
"*EXCLUSIVE TO GOLDEN SHARE* The Benbecula is the perfect chain free, energy efficient home which features a front-facing kitchen/breakfast area, plus spacious living room with French doors to the garden. The home features 1 double bedroom and 2 single - all sharing a contemporary family bathroom."
"Stylish one bedroom flat set on the first floor of an established, cul-de-sac development in Newington."
"New FIxed Price - This well presented second floor flat is situated in a traditional tenement building in the popular district of Newington, in the South of Edinburgh. A short distance from the City Centre, the location offers a great selection of local shops and amenities. The property is con..."
Beautifully presented second floor flat forming part of a traditional Victorian tenement in a prime location close to the City Centre. The generously proportioned property has been well looked after and is in move-in condition. It has a modern gas central heating system with a modern Worcester co...
"Light and immaculately presented, one-bedroom, corner-aspect, fourth-floor (top) flat of a modern residential development. Located in Leith's fashionable Shore district, lying to the north-east of Edinburgh city centre. The hall has space for outerwear, and features a built-in cupboard an..."
"A smart and well-proportioned one bedroom, second floor flat situated in an attractive period terrace in a thriving area conveniently located just west of the city ..."
"This impressive, well presented second floor flat is quietly situated within an established sought-after development, close to excellent amenities and well placed for commuting to ..."
Neilsons are delighted to offer to market this well-proportioned two bedroom second floor flat forming part of a popular retirement development situated within the highly ...
"Generously proportioned 2nd floor flat (one of the larger design types), forming part of a select modern development with lift, private allocated parking and well maintained ..."
"New Fixed Price - Boasting stunning views of Edinburgh Castle, this delightful fifth floor flat is located in the popular Grassmarket district in Central Edinburgh. The location is within easy reach of excellent local shops, restaurants and amenities and is a short distance from the City Centre. ..."
"Light and tastefully presented, two-bedroom, semi-detached villa with gardens and a multi-vehicle driveway. Located in the established residential area of Liberton, south of Edinburgh city centre, and exceptionally well-placed for the Royal Infirmary. A welcoming entrance porch opens into the ..."
91/22 Morningside Road is an attractive 3rd floor apartment with lift access in a small retirement development set in a desirable residential area close to an excellent range of local amenities. The property has been recently up-dated with modern storage heaters and a B.M.A.S. wet-room.Entrance h...
"Warners are delighted to present to the market this simply exquisite, two-bedroom terraced house with contemporary interior and quality finishes, offered to the market in superb ..."
"51/2 Balbirnie Place is a bright and spacious two bedroom ground floor flat situated within an exclusive residential development. An array of amenities can be found at nearby Roseburn and Murrayfield, with Haymarket Rail Station and the West End also within easy walking distance."
Spacious Two Bedroom Flat In The Bonnington Area Of Leith
A charming and well-appointed two-bedroomed second floor flat with an allocated parking space forming part of a converted Church on Edinburgh’s highly desirable Easter Road located just east of the city centre. The property is presented to the market in immaculate condition with...
"This one-bedroom apartment lies in Edinburgh’s sought-after historic Stockbridge. On the top floor of a modern property, it is well-proportioned with views of the Water of Leith and surroundings. Ideally located in a peaceful residential street and in easy reach of the City Centre. With exc..."
Well proportioned lower flat in popular Colinton Mains which has been sympathetically renovated to a high standard with many of the original features restored including wooden ...
"**Reduced Fixed Price £15,000 Below Home Report Valuation**"
Purplebricks offer to the market this Luxury 2 Bedroom 1st Floor flat with private parking beautifully presented to the market. This bright flat (56 sqm) occupies part of the first floor of an individually built residential block (2008) which will appeal to purchasers of all age groups and landl...
This 2 bedroom second floor apartment is a perfect home for first-time buyers with its well-proportioned interior.
This spacious and beautifully presented terraced villa with private gardens and garage forms part of an established residential area close to local amenities and commuting links. ...
"Light and beautifully presented, two bedroom, fourth ­floor corner aspect flat, set in a modern, factored residential development. Located in the popular Crewe area, north-­west of Edinburgh city centre. An entrance hall gives access throughout, and features wood-effect flooring, ..."
"Bridges Properties are delighted to welcome this spacious and bright three-bedroom flat is located on the sought-after Parkhead Street in Edinburgh. Situated in a built up residential area, the property benefits from an excellent location with easy access to local amenities and transport links."
"Now Fixed Price. Excellent first time buy, a must on your viewing list McDougall McQueen present to the market this bright and spacious two bedroom lower villa with a private garden to the rear and a driveway to the front. The property is ideally located in the popular and thriving Colinton Mains..."
Enjoy a popular and residential location with this well-presented three-bedroom apartment situated in Edinburgh’s sought-after leafy Corstorphine. This spacious and bright second floor property benefits from appealing contemporary upgrades to both the kitchen and shower room as well as shar...
"Set on the upper ground floor of a contemporary development in Canonmills, this immaculately presented flat accommodates a double bedroom, an open-plan living area, and a bathroom, and benefits from a private patio, access to communal outdoor space, and an unallocated parking space. The flat will..."
Spacious Three Bedroom Top Floor Flat In Edinburgh's Desirable Trinity Area
"A well-presented one-bedroom first-floor apartment, offering reconfiguration potential."
"Blair Cadell are delighted to bring to market this immaculate raised ground floor flat ideally placed for swift access to the city centre. In turn key condition, the property ..."
"Beautifully presented, two-bedroom, mid-terrace house with gardens and a view of Edinburgh skyline. Located in the popular Oxgangs area, to the south of Edinburgh city centre. The entrance porch provides space for outerwear and access to the carpeted stairs leading to the upper hall ..."
*** GOLDEN SHARE PROPERTY*** SUBJECT TO CRITERIA*** Three bed end terraced villa newly added to the market. It is positioned in a quiet residential estate with a fully enclosed rear garden. Ideal for families with all amenities close by.
A rare opportunity to purchase a plot with planning permission in a highly desirable location.
"This rarely available main door flat is located in the sought after district of Bruntsfield, in the South of Edinburgh. The property is close to a wide range of highly regarded amenities and recreational facilities and is within walking distance of the city centre. There are excellent transport l..."
"Located in the sought after residential area of Orchard Brae and set within well maintained communal grounds, 2/16 Orchard Brae Avenue is a delightful top floor flat with a large ..."
"A great opportunity to purchase a well proportioned two-bedroom, first floor flat in the popular Dalry area, lying west of Edinburgh City Centre."
Spacious two-bedroom flat in a fantastic location
"Closing Date set Tuesday 4th April @ 12noon.Excellent terraced villa with attractive red facing brick façade, and an outlook to well tended amenity ground, forming part of ..."
"Superb two-bedroom garden flat occupying an enviable location, close to a wonderful range of amenities and with easy access to the City Centre, and the open green spaces of ..."
"A unique opportunity has arisen to acquire this spacious, two-bedroom upper flat boasting a large, private rear patio area in the highly sought-after Granton area near north ..."
"Forming part of a contemporary development just a short walk from all the area has to offer, this exceptional top floor flat commands superb rooftop views to the Forth of Forth in one direction and the Pentland Hills in the other. The sitting/diningroom is lovely and light and offers the perfec..."
"A TWO BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE SECOND FLOOR This development was built by McCarthy & Stone plc and comprises 54 self-contained apartments on five floors, served by two lifts. It is purpose built for retirement and each apartment has an entryphone and communication to the..."
"*£15,000 below Home Report Value - Please note the property requires damp proofing works.  An estimate can be found at the end of the home report*This light and airy ..."
"New Fixed Price £10,000 below HR valuation. McDougall McQueen present to the market this well-proportioned two bedroom ground floor flat forming part of a block of six traditional terrace with a shared entry along with a shared garden to the rear and on street parking. The property is ideal..."
"Neilsons are delighted to present to market this stylish fourth floor apartment forming part of a handsome period terrace, enjoying a fabulous high amenity location in the heart ..."
"BUY TO LET Comfortable, 1-bedroom, rear facing ground floor apartment with communal gardens in the heart of the city. South of The Castle and Grassmarket, and north of The Meadows in central Edinburgh"
